Year: 1418
Date: April 12

After more than nine years away,
Gandalf returns to the Shire.
Bilbo departed almost seventeen years ago,
and Frodo himself is now forty-nine years old.
The wizard arrives in Hobbiton at dusk
and spends the night at Bag&nbsp;End.

Date: April 13

Gandalf breakfasts at Bag End,
having arrived yesterday after an absence of more than nine years.
He explains to Frodo that the magic ring Bilbo left him
is in fact the Ruling Ring of Sauron,
forged long ago so that through it
his will could dominate the Three Rings of the Elves
and, eventually, all of Middle-earth.
Frodo accepts that he will have to leave the Shire with the Ring,
and when Sam is caught eavesdropping
Gandalf designates him as Frodo's travelling companion.

Date: May 1

Gandalf meets Aragorn at Sarn Ford
and informs him that Frodo will be leaving for Rivendell in September.

Date: June 20

The forces of Sauron make a sudden attack
upon the ruins of the ancient city of Osgiliath
that straddle the River Anduin.
Not only are allied Easterlings and Haradrim present for the battle,
but Sauron for the first time deploys openly the Nazgul,
who exert their terror to drive back the soldiers of Gondor
and take the eastern half of the ruins.
<p>
They fail to push across the river, however,
for Boromir and Faramir &mdash;
the sons of the Ruling Steward &mdash;
hold the eastern end of the bridge with a few remaining soldiers
until the rest of their forces are able to destroy the bridge behind them.
Of the soldiers then trapped on the eastern bank,
only the two brothers and two other others
are able to swim the river and return alive.
<p>
But the main objective of Sauron is accomplished:
to make it appear as for the sake of the attack
that the Nine had been sent forth from Mordor and Dol Guldur,
so that their appearance in the West will be thought an act of war
rather than the beginnings of his hunt for the Ruling Ring.

Date: June 20

At around the same time as the Nazgul assault Osgiliath,
Orcs move over the mountains into northern Mirkwood
and attack the Wood-elves who hold Gollum hostage.
Though they are successful in freeing Gollum,
the Orcs themselves are apparently unable to apprehend him,
and Gollum disappears into the woods and travels southeast.

Date: June 29
Type: footnote

In some editions,
the <i>Tale of Years</i> gives this as the date on which Gandalf meets Radagast.
The main text, however, twice places their meeting on Midyear's Day:
(a)&nbsp;Gandalf at the Council of Elrond quotes Radagast as saying
&ldquo;<q>I was told to find you before Midsummer,
and that is now here</q>.&rdquo;
(b)&nbsp;The letter Gandalf leaves at Bree that evening
is dated &ldquo;<q>Midyear's Day</q>.&rdquo;

Date: Midyear

Having learned from fugitives on the southern borders of the Shire
that Gondor suffered a defeat nearly two weeks ago,
Gandalf rides the Greenway north from Sarn Ford toward Bree.
On the road he meets his fellow wizard Radagast,
who comes from their peer Saruman the White
with the news that the Nazgul have come forth from Mordor to war,
but that Saruman offers aid if Gandalf can reach him in time.
Gandalf is too weary to set off at once,
and spends the night at the Prancing Pony in Bree.
He leaves with the proprietor a letter
that urges Frodo to leave the Shire at once.

Date: Lithe 2

Gandalf and his horse leave Bree at dawn,
and begin the several-hundred mile journey down the Greenway
to the fortress of Isengard,
where the wizard Saruman has summoned him.
<p>
The innkeeper in Bree, Barliman Butterbur,
cannot find anyone to take Gandalf's letter to the Shire,
and he will soon forget about it entirely;
the letter will sit at the Inn for three more months
until Frodo himself arrives in Bree
with the Nazgul nearly upon his heels.

Date: July 4

Boromir leaves Minas Tirith to journey north
in search of the legendary valley of Imaldris,
where dwells the lore-master Elrond Halfelven
from whom Boromir hopes to learn the meaning of a dream.
His father, the Steward of Gondor,
has entrusted the long journey to Boromir
despite the fact that the dream came first &mdash;
and most often &mdash; to his brother Faramir.

Date: July 10

Gandalf reaches the fortress of Orthanc late in the evening.
Twelve days ago he received a message from the White Wizard Saruman
that the Nazgul were searching for the Shire,
but that Saruman could offer aid if Gandalf came quickly.
But once Gandalf enters the fortress,
Saruman reveals that his own desire is to either ally with Mordor
or possess the Ruling Ring himself.
He imprisons Gandalf on the platform atop his fortress,
where the Grey Wizard will remain imprisoned for more than two months.

Date: September 18

The Black Riders reach and cross the Fords of Isen,
passing out of the western marches of Rohan and entering Eriador
for perhaps the first time since their defeat by Cirdan and Earnur
more than one thousand years before.

Date: September 18

Early in the night the great eagle Gwaihir reaches Orthanc,
bearing reports of the Enemy's movements
that Radagast has gathered at the behest of Gandalf.
Finding the Grey Wizard himself atop the fortress,
imprisoned by the treacherous Saruman,
he bears Gandalf south toward Rohan.

Date: September 19

Gwaihir the Eagle deposits the wizard Gandalf in the land of Rohan,
whose lords are (falsely) rumored to give horses as tribute to Mordor.
Disguised as a beggar,
the wizard cautiously approaches the royal stronghold of Edoras,
and is denied entrance.

Date: September 20

With the help of his friends,
Frodo empties most of his belongings from Bag End,
sending two cartloads east toward his new home in Crickhollow.
Gandalf has been gone since late June
but is due back in two days at the latest.

Date: September 20

Gandalf abandons disguise and enters openly the Golden Hall of Meduseld.
He is rebuffed by King Theoden of Rohan,
whose mind has grown dark with suspicion
after months of whisperings from his deceitful counsellor Grima.
Theoden offers Gandalf any horse in his stables if the wizard will depart.

Date: September 21

Frodo becomes alarmed that Gandalf has not returned
after leaving the Shire in late June;
at the latest the wizard had promised to return
for tomorrow's birthday and farewell party.

Date: September 21

As King Theoden of Gondor yesterday offered Gandalf
any horse from his stables if only the wizard would depart,
the wizard today chooses Shadowfax, their greatest stallion;
the king is enraged at his insolence.
As the horse has never been broken,
he flees wild into the fields with the wizard in pursuit.

Date: September 22

Frodo and his friends celebrate his fiftieth birthday,
and his last night as the owner of Bag End.
They toast old Bilbo,
who departed the Shire on this night seventeen years ago.
Gandalf does not return &mdash;
the first time the Grey wizard has missed an appointment.

Date: September 22

The Nine Riders reach Sarn Ford on the southern border of the Shire
and find it guarded by several Rangers.
Some of these flee north to warn Aragorn,
while the others hold the Ford
until they are overpowered by the Witch-king after nightfall.
It is probably through this delay of only a few hours,
which these Rangers purchase with their lives,
that the Ring-bearer will avoid being captured
before he leaves Bag End tomorrow night.

Date: September 22

Gandalf overtakes Shadowfax upon the fields of Rohan,
into which he fled yesterday after the horse's release
from the stables of Edoras.
The wizard begins working with the great wild horse.

Date: September 23

Four Black Riders enter the Shire at dawn,
while the other five pursue the remaining Rangers into the Wild
and then return to keep watch on the Greenway.
Frodo and his friends pack one last cart,
which Merry and Fatty drive toward Buckland;
Sam and Pippin remain to hike with Frodo
across the Eastfarthing to his new home.
The Sackville-Bagginses arrive and take inventory
before the sale of Bag End goes into effect at midnight.
At dusk Frodo departs,
and overhears the Gaffer turning away an inquisitor;
and although Sam learns the visitor
is a stooped horseman cloaked in black,
he will not mention this to Frodo until tomorrow night.
The three Hobbits walk for several hours along the road to Woodhall
before making camp.

Date: September 23

Although the great horse Shadowfax cannot be broken
and indeed will never accept tack,
he reaches an understanding with Gandalf and permits the wizard to mount.
They ride northwest from the fields near Edoras.

Date: September 24

Frodo, Sam, and Pippin continue along the road towards Woodhall,
and in the afternoon are passed by a Black Rider
who pauses briefly while they lie concealed.
Another encounter occurs in the late evening &mdash;
on both occasions Frodo resists the temptation
to put on the Ring and disappear &mdash;
but this second time the rider dismounts and approaches their hiding place,
withdrawing only at the sound of approaching Elves.
The Elves recognize Frodo as a friend of Bilbo,
and when they learn that Black Riders are pursuing the Hobbits
their lord, Gildor Inglorion,
invites the Hobbits to lodge at their camp above Woodhall.
In conversation later at night Gildor shares begrudging council with Frodo,
names him an Elf-friend, and leaves provisions for the Hobbits.

Date: September 24

Gandalf upon Shadowfax crosses the Isen
and passes out of Rohan and into the Enedwaith of southern Eriador.
He rides in the wake of the Black Riders who passed six days earlier.

Date: September 25

Frodo, Sam, and Pippin set out cross county from the Elf-camp above Woodhall,
just in time to see a Black Rider arrive on the hilltop behind them.
After lunch they first hear the signal-cry of the Nazgul.
In the late afternoon they dine with Farmer Maggot,
whom a Black Rider visited earlier today;
he drives them to the river hidden in his wagon,
where Merry meets them and ferries them across.
From the eastern side of the river
they glimpse a Black Rider searching the shore they left behind.
After reaching the house at Crickhollow, bathing, and dining,
the younger hobbits reveal their knowedge of Frodo's quest.
Frodo accepts that Merry and Pippin will accompany he and Sam,
while Fatty Bolger remains behind
to sustain the fiction that Frodo is indeed living Crickhollow.

Date: September 25

Gandalf upon Shadowfax rides across the Enedwaith
between the rivers Isen and Greyflood.

Date: September 26

At daybreak the journey of the Ring begins in earnest,
as Frodo leaves his new house in Crickhollow
and together with Sam, Merry, and Pippin
passes under the Hedge that separates Buckland from the Old Forest.
They hope by avoiding the roads to pass out of the Shire
undetected by the cloaked Riders that have been pursuing them.
<p>
Through the day the trees of the forest
force their path to bend southward toward the valley of the Withywindle
where in the afternoon a great Willow traps the Hobbits.
They are rescued by Tom Bombadil,
who is passing up the river-valley
on his way home from gathering
some of the last of the season's water-lillies
for his wife.
The Hobbits follow him and are treated to dinner and warm beds at his house.

Date: September 26

Gandalf for a second day rides upon Shadowfax across the Enedwaith.

Date: September 27

Frodo, Sam, Merry, and Pippin wake in the house of Tom Bombadil;
deep rains pour upon the valley of the Withywindle
as his wife Goldberry does her &ldquo;autumn-cleaning.&rdquo;
They pass the day listening to his songs and tales,
which draw them deep into the secrets and counsels of the Forest,
and open out into remarkable vistas of the ancient lands
lying to the east of the Shire.
They spend a second and final night at his house.

Date: September 27

Gandalf upon Shadowfax crosses the river Greyflood at the ford of Tharbad,
passing from the Enedwaith into Hinhiriath.
He will spend little more than two weeks west of the river
before crossing back east across its tributary,
the Mitheithel, at a point more than three hundred miles to the north.

Date: September 28

Frodo, Sam, Merry, and Pippin wake, for a second morning,
in the house of Tom Bombadil,
and depart to continue their journey after breakfast.
As his house lies on the eastern edge of the Old Forest,
they by turning north
hope to pass safely along the west edges of the Barrow-downs
and so reach the East-West Road that will take them to Bree.
Instead they stray too near a standing stone on a hilltop,
and as night falls
are ensnared by a barrow-wight and trapped in one of the ancient graves.

Date: September 28

Gandalf reaches Sarn Ford one week behind the Black Riders and,
crossing the Baranduin,
enters the Shire from the south.

Date: September 29

Frodo wakes inside of a barrow,
one of the ancient hilltop crypts
that line the downs east of the Old Forest;
his companions Sam, Merry, and Pippin are unconscious beside him.
He calls on Tom Bombadil
and the four Hobbits are rescued from the Barrow-wight
who ensnared them when darkness fell last night.
As Tom empties the barrow of its treasure,
and thus of its curse,
he arms them each with a dagger from the hoard &mdash;
and thus provides Merry with the blade
with which he will strike the Witch-King at the Battle of the Pelennor Field
in five and a half months,
the same enemy whose servants killed the men buried in the barrow,
and the enemy against whom the blade is imbued with spells.
<p>
The Hobbits ride north to the East-West Road
and then east along it to Bree
where they lodge at the Prancing Pony.
They meet the Ranger called Strider,
and Butterbur the proprietor of the inn finally delivers to Frodo
the letter which Gandalf wrote to Frodo three months ago;
and they become convinced that Strider
is the &ldquo;Aragorn&rdquo;, son of Arathorn,
whom Gandalf's letter tells them to trust.
When they hear that Black Riders have been seen in Bree,
Strider has them spend the night in a lighted parlor of the inn
which they hope is less susceptible to attack
than the first-floor Hobbit rooms
in which they would otherwise have slept.

Date: September 29

Reports that Gandalf gathers after entering the Shire
indicate that only some of the Black Riders entered the district.
Upon reaching the Hill,
the wizard learns from Gaffer Gamgee
that Frodo departed with the Gaffer's son Samwise six days ago,
not two months earlier as urged in Gandalf's letter;
and that a Rider arrived later the same evening,
seeking the whereabouts of ``Baggins.''
The wizard fears the worst as he rides for the Eastfarthing.

Date: September 30

In the cold before dawn the Black Riders attack
the two locations to which they have traced Frodo:
the house at Crickhollow to which he has moved,
and the Hobbit rooms at the back of the inn at Bree.
Fredegar Bolger has been watching the house at Crickhollow
and flees as three Riders attack;
for the first time in more than a century the Horn of Buckland is blown,
and the only casualties by morning are the Buckland gate wardens
who are trampled while attempting to impede the Riders' escape.
At the Prancing Pony in Bree the Hobbits' rooms are ransacked,
but they are not harmed as they passed the night with Strider in the parlour.
As their ponies are missing,
they must purchase Bill Ferny's underfed and overpriced pony,
and depart Bree around ten o'clock in the morning
before a crowd of onlookers.
And after following the Road's course south and east around the Bree-hill,
Strider leads them off the road toward the north.

Date: September 30

By morning Gandalf reaches Buckland
and finds the Hobbits in arms and the house at Crickhollow ransacked;
in his haste he fails to interview the eyewitness Fatty Bolger,
who alone could have told him that Frodo entered the Old Forest days before.
Discovering one of Frodo's cloaks on the doorstep,
he assumes that the Hobbit and his Ring have been captured
and immediately sets out in pursuit.
The Riders have dispersed but Gandalf follows the trail leading to Bree,
arriving in the evening and learning from the innkeeper Butterbur
that Frodo departed that morning in the company of Strider.
Gandalf expects his first night's rest in more than a week.

Date: October 1

Strider leads the Hobbits east
through the Chetwood north of the Road.

Date: October 1

Gandalf leaves Bree before dawn upon Shadowfax,
riding east in pursuit of the five Riders
who passed through during the night.

Date: October 2

Strider and the Hobbits travelling east come out of the Chetwood
and enter the Midgewater marshes.
While walking during the day they are tormented by flies and midges,
and their sleep in camp is distrubed by the drone of loud insects.

Date: October 2

Gandalf continues riding east from Bree in pursuit of the Black Riders.

Date: October 3

Another day of travel through the Midge-water Marshes
brings Strider and the four Hobbits to another uncomfortable
and insect-tormented night of camping

Date: October 3

Gandalf reaches the summit of Weathertop in the afternoon;
the Nine Riders withdraw until sunset,
then attack the wizard amidst the foundations of the ancient watch-tower.

Date: October 4

The land across which Strider and the Hobbits travel begins to rise,
leaving behind the Midge-water Marshes
and raising the Weather Hills into sight to the east.
They are again approaching the Road,
which had turned south in a wide loop to avoid the marshes.
For the first time they set a watch overnight,
in addition to Strider's usual watchfulness.

Date: October 4

From their camp in the Midge-water Marshes,
Strider and Frodo see flashes of lightning to the east:
distant beacons of the battle Gandalf wages on Weathertop
against all nine of the Nazgul.
The wizard survives the night and flees to the northeast,
successfully drawing four Riders after him and away from the road.

Date: October 5

Morning frost and pale blue sky refresh the four Hobbits,
who with Strider begin another day of travel
that brings them to the feet of the Weather hills where they camp.

Date: October 5

Another day of Gandalf's fourteen-day trek from Weathertop to Rivendell,
by way of the Ettenmoors one hundred miles to the north.
Once the four Riders break off their pursuit a few days into the journey,
Shadowfax departs for Rohan
since he cannot assist Gandalf in the rocky troll-fells.

Date: October 6

Strider leads the Hobbits south
along the old fort-path that hugs the west side of the Weather Hills.
From the summit of Weathertop,
Frodo and Merry for the first time see the Misty Mountains.
Strider finds a <i>G</i>-rune left by Gandalf,
and correctly deduces
that the flashes he and Frodo saw in the eastern sky three nights ago
were a battle atop this hill between the wizard and the Nine Riders.
They see five Riders on the road below them,
which attack them at night in a dell north of the summit.
During the attack Frodo succumbs to the temptation to wear the Ring,
which while hiding him from mortal eyes
makes him visible to the Ring-wraiths
in whose minds the living are otherwise vague shadows.
The Witch-lord charges him and stabs his shoulder with a Morgul-knife
whose tip will remain in the wound,
working its way inward.

Date: October 7

Following the attack upon the party last night
in which the Lord of the Nazgul wounded Frodo,
Strider leads the Hobbits into the empty lands south of the Road
through which they continue to press east toward Rivendell.
Though they hear the distant cry and answer of two Nazgul
as they pass across the Road itself,
there is no further indication that they are being pursued;
they hope to again escape ambush by avoiding the East-West Road,
and they thread amongst the shelter
of thickets and small stands of trees &mdash;
and at night they light a campfire both to discourage another attack
and to keep Frodo warm.
Though he hides the fact from his friends,
the pain in his shoulder starts growing by the end of the day.

Date: October 9

The news has reached Elrond from the wandering company of Gildor
that Frodo the Hobbit is moving east from the Shire
and is carrying some great burden, without the guidance of Gandalf.
Elrond dispatches those of his household able to contest the Nine;
the Elf-lord Glorfindel is sent west along the great road.

Date: October 11

The Elven-lord Glorfindel reaches the bridge over the river Mitheithel
after two days of travel along the road from Rivendell,
and finds it guarded by three Nazgul.
While this suggests that the Ringbearer has not yet been captured,
it also indicates that he has probably not yet reached the Bridge.
As Glorfindel approaches, the three guards flee westward;
before pursuing them he leaves a beryl to mark his passage.

Date: October 11

Five days after leaving Weathertop and passing south of the road,
Strider leads the Hobbits out of the shallow valley
through which they have been travelling east,
and they angle towards the north to return to the Road,
on which they will reach the river Mitheithel and cross upon the Last Bridge.

Date: October 12

On the sixth day since Strider lead the Hobbits from Weathertop,
they reach the top of a slope from which they command a wide view
of the lands around them.
The East-West Road is visible to their north,
to which they will now return so that they can use the Last Bridge
to cross the river Mitheithel &mdash; which is also visible, to the east.
Many miles to the south they can see both the Hoarwell and the Loudwater.

Date: October 13

In the morning Strider leads the Hobbits back to the East-West Road,
which they abandoned seven days ago
in order to travel through the wilds to its south
and so avoid the searches of the Nazgul.
They reach the Last Bridge,
across which the Road crosses the river Mitheithel,
and find the beryl-stone which Glorfindel left two days ago
when he drove off the three Riders guarding the bridge.
Correctly interpreting this as meaning that crossing the bridge is safe,
Strider leads the Hobbits across,
then they again abandon the road,
turning north into Troll-fells.

Date: October 14

Strider leads the Hobbits for a second day
amongst the valleys and ridges of Troll-fells north of the Road
as they travel farther from the river Mitheithel
and toward the Bruinen,
on the far side of which lies Rivendell.

Date: October 15

On their third day of clambering among the Troll-fells,
rains begins to pour upon Strider and the Hobbits.
For probably the first evening since leaving Bree more than two weeks ago,
they are unable to even light a fire for warmth
despite the fact that Frodo's wound continues to worsen.

Date: October 16

As the hills rise higher in front of them,
Strider and the Hobbits
must turn farther northwards into the Troll-fells &mdash;
detouring away from both the Road to the south
and the river Bruinen which they are trying to reach to their east.
The wound that Frodo received on Weathertop ten days ago
for the first time tonight prevents him from sleeping because of the pain.

Date: October 16

The Elf-lord Glorfindel,
who since crossing the Last Bridge five days ago
has been searching for the Hobbits back west of the river Mitheithel,
finds their trail which leads him back east across the Bridge
and toward Rivendell.
He sees their trail turn north into the Troll-fells,
but travels straight east along the road
hoping to encounter them when they return to it.

Date: October 17

The rain clears that has been soaking Strider and the Hobbits,
and they are able to turn south again toward the Road
and they camp atop a ridge.
Frodo is becoming very weak,
which is making progress through the fells very difficult.

Date: October 18

Strider and the Hobbits leave their camp on the ridge in the Troll-fells,
enjoying the clear morning after more than two days of steady rain.
Frodo is succumbing to the wound of the Morgul-knife
he received twelve days ago;
a mist occasionally obscures his sight
as his perception of the lighted world begins to dim.
Winding downhill to the south,
back toward the Road,
they discover the trolls &mdash;
long since turned to stone &mdash;
that Bilbo encountered on his own journey east seventy-seven years ago.
Late in the evening they reach the Road,
and meet the Elf-lord Glorfindel.
After attending to Frodo's wound,
Glorfindel leads them in a night march eastward along the road.

Date: October 18

After a journey of fourteen days from Weathertop,
Gandalf reaches the safety of Imladris.
He assists Elrond in preparing a flood of the river Bruinen
should the Riders attempt to cross the Ford.

Date: October 19

After walking all night,
Glorfindel and Strider halt at dawn
and allow the Hobbits five hours of sleep.
Through the day they accomplish three further long marches,
covering almost twenty miles,
and reach a point where the road bends right and turns into valley.

Date: October 20

Early in the morning Glorfindel and Strider wake the Hobbits
and set out on a final march east
along the Road toward the Fords of Bruinen.
As they reach its floodplain,
they are overtaken from behind by five mounted Nazgul,
and then four more emerge from ambush
as the white horse of Glorfindel carries Frodo toward the Ford.
They make it across the Ford;
the Lord of the Nazgul begins to cross after them;
and then all Nine are swept away
as Elrond and Gandalf release the flood they have been preparing,
and Glorfindel and Strider attack from behind
and panic the horses of those who remain on the west bank.

Date: October 24

Boromir, in the late evening of his hundred and eleventh day of travel,
reaches Imladris, the valley of Rivendell, of which he knew only legend,
and begins to search for the house of Elrond.

Date: October 25

In the early hours Boromir,
who yesterday entered the valley of Rivendell itself
after more than a hundred days of travel from his home in Minas Tirith,
finally reaches the house of Elrond.

Date: October 25

With Frodo safe in Rivendell and having regained consciousness yesterday,
the Council of Elrond is now called,
and decides to attempt the destruction of the Ring
in the heat of the mountain in which it was forged.

Date: October 25

Through the afternoon following the Council of Elrond,
scouts begin leaving Rivendell
to determine whether the Nine Riders still linger west of the Mountains.
Aragorn leaves with the sons of Elrond,
who will head southeast across the Misty Mountains and down the Silverlode
while Aragorn himself goes West and hunts with his Rangers.

Date: October 26
Through: December 24

With Frodo recovered and the Council of Elrond complete,
the Hobbits find themselves free to enjoy
the feasts and songs and autumn starlight of Rivendell,
and the company of their old friend Bilbo.
While Sam has already been given permission
to accompany his master on his quest,
Elrond has not yet decreed
whether Merry and Pippin will be allowed to accompany them.
<p>
Gandalf and Elrond continue to consult with one another
about arrangements for the impending quest.
Among the other guests of Elrond
who remain at Rivendell through the close of autumn
are Boromir of Gondor, the wood-elf Legolas,
and Gimli, son of the dwarf Gloin
with whom Bilbo adventured seventy-seven years ago.

Date: December 25

In the morning old Bilbo gives both his old sword Sting
and his mithril mail-shirt to Frodo who,
he asserts,
will be in much greater need of them than he.
Each member of the party bears a sword, save Gimli and his dwarven axe;
they carry much of their own luggage in packs
save that which can be laden upon the pony they brought from Bree.
The quiet of their evening departure above the roaring brook
is broken only by Boromir's winding of his horn,
always his custom upon starting a journey.
After receiving their charge from Elrond
they walk south as the night falls,
out of Rivendell and into the Wild.

Date: December 26

For two weeks the Company of the Ring,
having left Rivendell on the twenty-fifth of December,
struggles southward beneath a chilly grey sky.
Aragorn leads them as they pass through the desolate lands
between the river Bruinen,
which flows far away to their west,
and the Misty Mountians which rise to the east.
The wind blows cold off of the mountains.
To avoid attention they journey chiefly at night,
and sleep as best they can through the middle of the day.

Year: 1419
Date: Yule 2

For two weeks the Company of the Ring,
having left Rivendell on the twenty-fifth of December,
struggles southward beneath a chilly grey sky
which blows cold off the peaks of the Misty Mountains to the east.
To avoid attention they journey chiefly at night
and sleep as best they can through the middle of the day.
Aragorn leads them as they pass through the desolate lands
between the Bruinen and Mountians.

Date: January 7

The Company of the Ring approaches Hollin,
where Elves dwelt in ancient times.
Warm winds from the south meet them and bring clear sky and sunlight,
driving away the cold grey clouds under which they have labored
for the entire fortnight since their departure from Rivendell.
They again rest during the day and march during the night
to discourage observation by servants of either Isengard or Mordor.

Date: January 8

The Company of the Ring reaches the land of Hollin,
where stood the Elven-city of Eregion
through almost a thousand years of the Second Age &mdash;
now so long ago that Legolas detects Elven-sympathy only in the worked stones
strewn among the grass and holly-trees.
In the clear air they descry the Mountains of Moria,
those three peaks which lie above Khazad-dum,
those most ancient delvings of the dwarves.
Gimli is elevated almost to rapture
when Gandalf announces that the Company
will now cross the mountains and descend the Dimrill stair,
passing the sacred Mirrormere.
<p>
Most of the Company are asleep by morning,
when great flocks of Saruman's crows pass over the Company &mdash;
which Aragorn recognizes as native to the forests near Isengard;
a single croak from the flock probably indicates the moment
at which the Company is spotted.
In the evening the crows return southwards with their tidings.
The Company abandons plans to rest tonight
and Aragorn leads the Company along an ancient road toward the Redhorn Pass.

Date: January 9

The Company of the Ring spent last night
marching along the ancient road
that leads from the desolate ruins of Eregion,
an ancient Elven-city,
toward the Redhorn Pass to the south.
At dawn they stop and try to spend the day asleep, and in hiding,
in case the great flocks of birds return
that yesterday may have spotted their camp.
As the early winter winter evening brings the safety of darkness,
they resume their journey toward the Pass.
Aragorn hopes to bring them quickly over the mountains
and into the safety of Lorien
before their position is discovered and they are intercepted.

Date: January 10

The Company of the Ring continues to march overnight,
and to sleep, hidden, during the daytime,
because of the flock of birds
that spotted them in the ruins of Eregion the day before yesterday.
The march they make before dawn
brings them past the halfway point
of their journey from Eregion to the Redhorn pass,
and when they start again at nightfall
they grow near to the feet of the mountains themselves —
the first time the Hobbits have actually drawn this close
to the Misty Mountains that they heard about as children
in Bilbo's tales.

Date: January 11

After marching through the night,
the Company of the Ring reaches the foot of Caradhras.
Frodo overhears Gandalf and Aragorn debating;
the wizard fears they will be observed
if they attempt the barren Redhorn pass,
and perhaps trapped by severe weather,
but Aragorn resists the &lsquo;<q>dark and secret</q>&rsquo; path
which is the only alternative Gandalf offers.
They finish their debate privately when the Company wakes in late afternoon,
and Gandalf announces that they will climb the pass;
by midnight they reach the mountain's lower cliffs.

Date: January 12

In the long hours before dawn,
heavy snow traps the Company of the Ring
as they attempt to scale the path up the side of Caradhras
and cross the Misty Mountains there
by the pass known as the Redhorn Gate.
When the Hobbits fall and become drowsy with cold,
Gandalf gives them draughts of <i>miruvor</i> brought from Rivendell.
When attempts to light a fire with flint fail in the swirling wet cold,
he abandons secrecy and lights their fire with a word of Command.
<p>
The first hours of daylight are spent forcing passage through the snow,
and they spend the rest of the day climbing back down
to the lower slopes of the mountain.
They halt in the evening,
and Gandalf argues that they should now attempt
to pass under the mountains, through the dark Mines of Moria,
where he hopes that there remain friendly Dwarves.
Several of the Company are against the idea,
and foresight comes upon Aragorn as he warns Gandalf,
‘if you pass the doors of Moria, beware!’
But the Company is quickly persuaded of Gandalf's wisdom
when they hear wolves howling about them in the dark
and prepare for their camp to be attacked.

Date: January 13

The Company of the Ring spends the night
atop a small hill near the feet of Caradhras,
after their failure yesterday to climb the Redhorn pass.
Powerful wolves that Aragorn calls <i>Wargs</i>
attack them in the hours before dawn.
Gandalf calls the first Warg to appear a ‘Hound of Sauron’,
though it seems more likely that they were dispatched from Isengard
after the Company was spotted by the flocks of crows five days ago.
After hours of slinking through the darkness
just beyond the edge of the firelight,
the Wargs finally attack,
but are driven back as Gandalf calls down fire
and ignites the ring of trees around their hilltop.
<p>
The Company are now convinced that they need to flee through Moria,
where their pursuers will not be able to follow.
The pale winter sun rises into a clear sky
that offers little concealment
as the wizard leads them south toward the Sirannon,
the Gate-stream, whose bed they find parched and dry.
The ancient road beside it leads them to the Walls of Moria,
where a dam across the Sirannon has formed a wide lake.
They detour safely around its northern edge in the gathering dark,
and reach the Gate of Moria during the night.

Date: January 14
Characters: company

An hour or two after midnight,
the waning moon rides high enough above the Misty Mountains
to illuminate the Gate of Moria in the rock face
in front of which the Company of the Ring are gathered.
Just as Gandalf opens the Moria Gate,
a monster grasps at them from the dark shallows
where Boromir in frustration had just thrown a stone.
They free Frodo from its tentacles —
the monster singles out the Ring-bearer for attention,
as will happen again when trolls attack them in the Mines
in three days —
and the Company escapes into Moria.
<p>
The monster closes the doors behind them and blocks them with debris,
uprooting the pair of holly-trees
that have stood beside the Gate for more than six thousand years.
(The trees were gifts from the Elves of Eregion to the Dwarves of Moria,
before that Elven city was destroyed in the Second Age,
and the Dwarves driven from the mines in the Third.)
The Company begins their march through the Mines,
lacking much of their luggage,
and without any source of light save Gandalf's staff.
<p>
Since entering the Mines meant abandoning Bill the pony,
who has carried their luggage since his purchase in Bree
more than three months ago,
Gandalf placed words of guard upon him before opening the Gate.
These apparently work quite well,
for not only does Bill escape from the monster in the waters,
but after weeks of wandering in the Wild
will eventually return safely to Rivendell.
<p>
Several hours after midnight
the Company ends their first march through Moria,
when they reach an intersection at which Gandalf's guidance falters.
They choose a nearby chamber in which to sleep,
where Pippin drops a stone down a deep shaft &mdash;
and is answered by hammers tapping some signal in the depths.
The Company sleeps while the wizard smokes and ponders,
then marches through the rest of the day and into the night
before reaching a great pillared hall.
There they sleep,
expecting that dawn will bring sunlight through the windows and shafts
by which Dwarves lighted their dwellings.
<p>
During these early marches Frodo sees unusually well in the dark,
a hint of the slight transparency he bears from the Morgul-wound
that he suffered on distant Weathertop more than three months ago.
He also begins to hear the padding footfalls of Gollum behind them,
and while on watch in the hall he once glimpses green eyes in the distance.
Gollum has already wandered through Moria nearly to the West-gate
when the Company entered the mines,
and, though nearly famished, is now energized again
by the close presence of the Ring.

Date: January 15

The Company wakes in Moria when daylight touches a side chamber
where they find both Balin's tomb
and the tattered chronicle of his Dwarven settlement.
Gandalf reads selections from which they deduce
that they slept in Hall twenty-one of Moria's North-end
and are standing in the Chamber of Mazarbul;
they also learn that the lake and tentacled monster by the West-gate
were contrived to trap the Dwarven settlers.
Barely a minute after Gandalf reads the final words &mdash;
`Drums, drums in the deep &mdash; <i>they are coming</i>' &mdash;
they hear great drum-beats pound up from the depths below.
<p>
But the Dwarves who perished in the Chamber twenty-five years before
had fought assault from both directions,
while the hasty attack now brought against the Company
threatens only the Chamber's western door;
after brief battle in which Frodo survives a terrible spear-thrust,
the Company escapes through the east door
and down a narrow stair.
Gandalf remains behind to lock the door,
and is nearly destroyed when his spell is challenged
from some presence on the other side;
the door shatters and the Chamber collapses under the strain.
<p>
After an hour of fleeing southward down dark corridors &mdash;
for Gandalf now lacks the strength to light his staff &mdash;
they reach the Second Hall and the narrow Bridge of Khazad-dum.
Behind them in the hall, leading orcs in pursuit, strides a Balrog:
the power that opposed the locking-spell,
and the terror to which the vast Dwarven city succumbed.
Gandalf orders the Company to flee without him &mdash;
though the valor of Aragorn and Boromir
constrains them from obeying &mdash;
and turns back toward the pursuit.
<p>
There upon the bridge Gandalf challenges the Balrog,
his ancient peer,
another Ainur who dwelt in the halls of Iluvatar
before the world's beginning.
Though the demon towers in fresh strength
above the wizard weary with heavy labors
and the mortal flesh he has assumed,
the strength of the Grey Wizard and the Ring he bears proves the greater;
the Balrog's sword shatters and the Bridge falls from beneath it.
But with a final lash of its whip it entangles the wizard
and both fall into the dark beneath Moria.
<p>
The remaining members of the Company pass out of Moria
and on to the Dimrill Stair beneath the sky.
Gimli takes Frodo and Sam aside to look in the Mirrormere
whose waters reveal Durin's crown shining behind the blue sky above them;
and when wounds are tended
the Company discovers that Frodo survived the spear-thrust
because he wears the mail-shirt made of mithril
that Bilbo gave him on the eve of his depature from Rivendell
more than three weeks ago.
They march to the falls of Nimrodel under the eaves of Lorien
where they receive cautious welcome from the Elves,
whom the Sons of Elrond warned of the Ring's journey two months ago.
<p>
Gandalf and the Balrog finally plunge into water, quenching the Balrog's fire;
and in the dark Gandalf clutches his fleeing opponent
as his only hope of escape from the deeps.
Only after eleven days of weary battle will the two die.

Date: January 16

The Company wakes from sleep beside the falls of Nimrodel,
upon the high flets where the Elves guarding Lorien
offered them shelter last night.
The Orcs that pursued them from Moria
passed beneath them before dawn,
lured away by the Elves;
but Gollum, who has also followed the Company from Moria,
was not distracted,
and began climbing Frodo's tree before the approach of Elves
forced his retreat into the dark.
<p>
The Company are lead across the river Celebrant
(on the rope bridge that proves so daunting to the Hobbits)
and into the interior of Lorien,
where Gimli must be blindfolded before proceeding;
the others submit to this humiliation for his sake.
They march through the day, and fall asleep still blindfolded.
<p>
Gollum flees from the Elves who fill the woods in pursuit of the orcs,
and follows the Silverlode south.
He will lurk along Lorien's southern borders by the Great River
until the Company emerges next month.

Date: January 17

The Company wake in Lorien, still blindfolded,
and are escorted further inward
towards the Elven-city at the heart of the wood.
When they reach Cerin Amroth at noon
their blindfolds are finally removed,
and Gimli becomes the first Dwarf to see the trees of Lorien
in more than a thousand years.
Frodo and Sam themselves are shown,
from atop a high flet,
the heights of Dol Guldur —
from which the assault against Lorien
that the servants of the Sauron have been preparing
will finally be launched, in less than eight weeks.
Aragorn stands upon Cerin Amroth one last time,
wrapped in the memory of the vows he and Arwen exchanged there
almost thirty-nine years ago.
<p>
A final evening march brings the Company
to the woodland city of Caras Galadhon itself,
where they are welcomed by Celeborn and Galadriel,
the Lord and Lady of Lorien,
who are dismayed by the news of Gandalf's fall.
The Elves furnish a pavilion —
since Hobbits, in particular, prefer sleeping at ground level —
and the travellers are able to sleep without fear
for the first time since leaving Rivendell almost four weeks ago.

Date: January 18
Character: Legolas Gimli

On the second evening that the Company rests in Caras Galadon,
Legolas does not return to their pavilion in the evening;
for the rest of their stay in Lorien
he spends most of his time among his fellow Elves,
often taking Gimli with him as he explores the golden wood
and its people.

Date: January 23
Characters: Gandalf

Gandalf's weary pursuit of the Balrog finally concludes,
as they emerge from the top of the fabled Endless Stair
and out on to the dizzy summit of Zirak-zigil.
The Balrog bursts again into flame,
and the two begin their final combat.

Date: January 24
Characters: Gandalf

Gandalf continues for a second day to fight the Balrog of Moria
upon the highest ledges of Zirak-zigil.
The fires and lightnings melt its cap of snow,
leaving the rock bare and scorched.

Date: January 25
Characters: Gandalf

<i>Death of Gandalf the Grey.</i>
Ten days after falling from the bridge of Khazad-dum,
and after two days of combat upon the peak of Zirak-zigil,
Gandalf finally concludes his struggle with the Balrog of Moria.
His opponent falls and is destroyed against the mountainside;
Gandalf himself collapses and dies.

Date: February 14
Characters: Frodo Sam Merry Pippin Aragorn Boromir Legolas Gimli

In the dusk of evening,
Sam finally gets his wish: to see Elven-magic!
He and Frodo are invited to look in the Mirror of Galadriel:
a basin of water she pours, across which images pass.
But Sam finds the experience bitter,
as all three are torn by difficult choices.
Sam sees the Shire ravaged, and his father homeless,
and only on the verge of tears
can he choose to continue following his master.
Frodo himself sees the Eye of Sauron searching for him,
and perceives the Elven-ring on Galadriel's finger
whose power will be ended if his quest succeeds;
he responds with the vast gesture of offering her the Ruling Ring.
Galadriel refuses to take the Dark Lord's place,
and announces that, their choices having been made,
the time has come for them to depart.
<p>
Later the entire Company are called before the Lord and Lady,
and Celeborn offers them boats
on which they can ride the Anduin south for many miles
before having to choose whether to turn west toward Minas Tirith
or east towards Mordor.
The Company returns to their pavilion for one last evening of rest,
and debate long into the night which direction they should choose.

Date: February 14
Characters: Gandalf

Gandalf returns to life,
now with the color White: the head of the order of Wizards.
His body has lain atop Zirak-zigil for almost three weeks
since the conclusion of his battle with the Balrog of Moria.
Disoriented by his return,
he lies in a trance upon the peak.

Date: February 15
Characters: Frodo Sam Merry Pippin Aragorn Boromir Legolas Gimli

The Company spends the morning preparing to depart from Lorien
and continue their quest, which now enters its final forty days.
The Elves provide them with the Elven waybread that will often sustain them,
the cloaks and broaches that will clad them to their journey's end,
and the rope that will bear Sam and Frodo off the Emyn Muil.
Galadriel herself gives them gifts &mdash; sheath, bow, box, and phial &mdash;
and gives Aragorn the Elfstone for which his people will name him.
Gimli requests, and receives, a strand of her hair.
They hear her singing of the fading years
as their boats enter the Great River and are borne south.
<p>
Gollum has been hiding along the west bank for a month,
waiting for the Ring to emerge from the terrible Wood.
He begins to trail the Company down the Anduin upon bank and driftwood.

Date: February 15
Characters: Gandalf

Having revived yesterday following his death three weeks ago,
Gandalf lies for a second day in a trance upon the peak of Zirak-zigil.

Date: February 16
Characters: Frodo Sam Merry Pippin Aragorn Boromir Legolas Gimli

The Company wake early in their camp on the west bank of the Anduin&nbsp;&mdash;
their first morning back in the Wild
since reaching the safety of Lorien four weeks ago.
They spend both day and evening
moving south on the river in their Elven-boats
before making camp again.

Date: February 16
Characters: Gandalf

Gandalf lies for a third day alone upon the peak of Zirak-zigil.

Date: February 16
Type: footnote

The <i>Tale of Years</i> incorrectly states
that the Fellowship left Lorien on this date;
but the text clearly states that they departed
the morning after Frodo and Sam looked in the Mirror of Galadriel.
One can also count backward from
&ldquo;<q>The fifth of March in the Shire-reckoning</q>,&rdquo;
the date Aragorn gives Pippin at Isengard,
to confirm February&nbsp;15th as the date of their departure.

Date: February 17
Characters: Frodo Sam Merry Pippin Aragorn Boromir Legolas Gimli

The lands through which the Anduin flows
as the Company ride its current south begin to change.
Since their departure from Lorien two days ago,
they have been floating between wooded banks;
but as they continue south today the trees become sparse.
When in the evening they make camp upon the west bank,
the green plains of the north Riddermark are visible to the west
and the rough and blasted Brown Lands lie to their east &mdash;
which continue east toward Rhun, and south toward Mordor.

Date: February 17
Characters: Gandalf

The great Eagle Gwaihir the Windlord,
who almost exactly five months ago rescued Gandalf
from the pinnacle of the fortress of Orthanc,
now discovers the wizard stranded upon the peak of Zirak-zigil.
He carries the wizard to Lorien where he will rest briefly
before returning to the labors interrupted
by his struggle with the Balrog and death.

Date: February 18
Characters: Frodo Sam Merry Pippin Aragorn Boromir Legolas Gimli

The Company spend another long day on the river,
borne south upon the current of the Anduin.

Date: February 19
Characters: Frodo Sam Merry Pippin Aragorn Boromir Legolas Gimli

Lorien now lies four days behind the Company.
They feel exposed as they float between banks
devoid of almost any vegitation.
As dusk closes over their boats,
Sam glimpses eyes atop a log in the current behind them;
and after the company makes camp for the evening &mdash;
again on the west bank, since Orcs control the eastern shore &mdash;
he reveals to Frodo his guess that Gollum is following them,
and learns that his master had sighted the creature weeks ago
when they slept upon the flet after entering Lorien.
Fearing that they may be strangled in their sleep,
the two agree to keep watch overnight;
Sam takes the first shift.

Date: February 20
Characters: Frodo Sam Merry Pippin Aragorn Boromir Legolas Gimli

Just after midnight Frodo wakes
in the camp the Company have made on the west bank of the Anduin,
and takes over from Sam
the watch the two of them have set for Gollum,
whom Sam believes he saw yesterday evening on the River.
Hours before dawn,
the creature indeed appears by their boats,
but retreats when Frodo brandishes Sting.
This confrontation awakes Aragorn,
who reveals that he has been aware of Gollum for several days
but has failed to capture him.
The Ranger sends Frodo to sleep and keeps watch until dawn.
<p>
Uneasiness continues to wear upon the Company
as they drift south upon the Anduin for a fifth day since leaving Lorien,
for the country around them remains bare of cover for their journey;
barren hills begin to rise on the east-bank.
They begin periodic use of their paddles to speed their journey,
and Merry and Pippin note that Boromir seems quietly eager
to remain near the boat carrying Aragorn and the Ring-bearer.

Date: February 21
Characters: Frodo Sam Merry Pippin Aragorn Boromir Legolas Gimli

The sixth day arrives
since the Company woke for the last time
beneath the golden mallorn of Lorien
and committed themselves to the great river Anduin.
As the river carries them southward toward lands held by the Enemy,
they now sleep during the day under what cover they can find
and move at night.

Date: February 22
Characters: Frodo Sam Merry Pippin Aragorn Boromir Legolas Gimli

After paddling their boats until dawn
the Company make camp again on the west-bank of Anduin
and sleep through most of the day before proceeding south again.
They have now been seven days out of Lorien.
Overcast skies begin to clear
and they see the new moon setting in the west soon after sunset.

Date: February 23
Characters: Frodo Sam Merry Pippin Aragorn Boromir Legolas Gimli

The Company have now been on the Anduin for a week
since parting from Lorien.
The hills about the river become larger and more rocky
as they paddle and drift southwards before dawn,
and many birds flutter about the cliffs and chimneys
as they camp under cover during the day;
but far above they descry a hunting-eagle
(spying for Saruman,
though they will not guess this until his Uruk-hai attack them
three days hence).
<p>
The take to the water again at dusk
and just before midnight reach the deadly rapids of Sarn Gebir &mdash;
they are miles south of where Aragorn had imagined them.
The strong current draws them toward both the rapids and the east-bank,
from which Orcs fire arrows from sudden ambush.
They gain the west-bank without injury &mdash;
their boats and grey elven-cloaks apparently present difficult targets
even for Orcs in the darkness &mdash;
and Legolas turns and with an arrow fells the flying carrion-steed
of a Nazgul that flew toward them from the south.

Date: February 24
Characters: Frodo Sam Merry Pippin Aragorn Boromir Legolas Gimli

The Company spends the night under cover on the west-bank
after the Orc ambush they suffered on the river above the rapids
just before midnight.
At dawn Boromir advocates abandoning their boats
for an overland march through eastern Rohan and so down to Gondor.
But Aragorn wishes both to avoid the fens of the lower Entwash
and especially to reach the ancient High Seat upon Amon Hen &mdash;
the Hill of Seeing beside the river
where the narrow waters of Nen Hithoel empty over the thundering Rauros &mdash;
from whence he hopes to exercise his ancestral sight
and take counsel before leaving the River.
<p>
Aragorn and Legolas set out westward at daybreak
and find further inland the old portage-road around the rapids of Sarn Gebin.
The Company spends the day moving their gear first to the road,
then down to the foot of the rapids,
where they lay down exhausted for an uneventful night of sleep.

Date: February 25
Characters: Frodo Sam Merry Pippin Aragorn Boromir Legolas Gimli

Brief drizzle before dawn is followed by heavy rains in the morning
after the Company leave their camp at the base of the rapids of Sarn Gebin
and float down the Anduin between cliffs that rise upon both hands.
But the clouds clear and blue sky stands above them
when finally they reach and pass the Argonath,
where the Anduin runs between the colossi of Isildur and Anarion
standing guard upon the border of ancient Gondor;
and Frodo perceives the strength of the king, Aragorn son of Arathorn,
sitting in the stern behind him as they pass beneath the images.
<p>
As their tenth day on the river since leaving Lorien draws to its close,
they make camp upon the green slope of Parth Galen,
which lies on the western shore of lake Nin Hithoel
beside tall Amon Hen and just north of the thundering Rauros
where the waters of the Anduin pour down from these hills of the Emyn Muil.

Date: February 25

<i>First Battle of the Fords of Isen.</i>
Theodred, the son of King Theoden,
is slain in battle with the forces of Saruman
attempting to defend the Fords of Isen.

Date: February 26

Before dawn Aragorn and Frodo observe the edges of Sting gleaming faintly,
warning them of distant Orcs;
they guess that these are on the east-shore of the lake,
but in fact a large force of Orcs of Mordor and of the Misty Mountains,
and Uruk-hai of Saruman,
are approaching from the north
with orders to destroy the Company but take any Hobbits alive.
<p>
In the morning comes the hour
when the Company must finally decide their course.
Frodo wanders the slopes of Amon Hen steeling himself to choose the East;
Boromir follows,
urges Frodo to bear the Ring to Gondor for use in war,
and finally tries to seize it himself;
whereupon Frodo dons the Ring and runs invisible toward the summit.
<p>
From the Seat of Seeing atop Amon Hen,
Frodo perceives strife and preparation for war
from Mirkwood to the Sea
and from the ring of Isengard to the fires of Mordor &mdash;
and there his gaze is captured by the Lidless Eye
that begins to grope for him and the Ring he wears.
But from afar Gandalf challenges the dark thought of Sauron,
and in the balance between them Frodo chooses to remove the Ring
and escape the searching Eye.
His will is thus tempered and he resolves to depart for Mordor alone,
neither leading his companions into danger
nor tempting them further with the Ring.
<p>
Boromir returns and describes their argument;
the other Hobbits are immediately suspicious and run off calling for Frodo.
Only Sam perceives Frodo's intentions and intercepts him at the boats,
and the two set out together across the lake.
Behind them on the western shore the Orcs pour through the woods,
and the great horn of Boromir is winded for the last time
as he is overwhelmed and Merry and Pippin are captured;
it is said later that his horn-blasts were heard far away in Minas Tirith.
Aragorn arrives in time to receive Boromir's dying confession,
and after committing his body to the falls in an elven-boat,
the Ranger and Legolas and Gimli set off after their captured companions.

Date: February 26

Merry and Pippin awake as prisoners of the Orcs.
During a confrontation among his captors,
Pippin is able to sever the bonds about his wrist;
upon reaching the plain after nightfall he swerves aside
and drops his Elven-clasp in the hope that Strider finds it.
Then he is forced back into line and the Orcs lope off northwest-wards
toward the distant borders of Fangorn.

Date: February 26

Eomer, the Third Marshal of the Mark of Rohan, hears from one of his scouts
that a great company of Orcs has descended to the plains from the Emyn Muil.

Date: February 26

In the afternoon Frodo and Sam reach the east-shore of Nen Hithoel
and hide their elven-boat
before climbing into the broken hills of the Emyn Muil
where they spend a first night.
On his watch Frodo is startled to see gleaming eyes in the distance,
hint that Gollum has followed the Ring across the river
and is following them across the barren ridges.

Date: February 27

Merry and Pippin remain another day in the grasp
of the Orc-band that captured them yesterday by the Great River.
The leaders, large Uruk-hai bred by Saruman,
drive forward through the daylight
both the mountain-Orcs that came to avenge their losses in Moria
and the sinister Orcs of Mordor
that already sense treachery in Saruman's bid
to acquire these prisoners for himself.

Date: February 27

In the dark hours just after midnight,
Eomer resolves to disobey King Theoden's order
that his force remain available for the last defense of Edoras.
Fearing that Saruman has formed some alliance with their enemy the Dark Lord,
he leads his eored northward in pursuit
of the Orc-company that descended yesterday evening
from the Emyn Muil.

Date: February 27

Through the hours before dawn Aragorn, Legolas, and Gimli pursue the Orcs
that yesterday captured Merry and Pippin on the lower slopes of Amon Hen.
By sunrise they reach the crest of the Emyn Muil,
and Aragorn sees the White Mountains of Gondor again after many long years;
also the light reveals the Orc-band already more than twelve leagues away
and moving in a straight march toward the north-west.
They spend the day in pursuit,
finding the elven-brooch that Pippin cast aside;
then at night they rest
rather than wear themselves out and miss any further signs.

Date: February 27

Frodo and his servant Sam spend their first full day
negotiating the difficult and often impassible Emyn Muil
as they struggle eastward toward the marshes that lie at their feet.

Date: February 28

Merry and Pippin wake as prisoners on the plain beside the narrow Entwash,
and can see the Misty Mountains and Fangorn Wood to the northwest.
Here the composite Orc-party disintegrates:
most of the mountain-Orcs flee for the wood,
and the Orcs of Mordor who had fled eastwards
return when scouts report that more than a hundred Riders of Rohan
are approaching from the south.
The Uruk-hai, despite the burden of two Hobbits,
outrun both the mountain-Orcs and those of Mordor
and are thus in the lead when they reach the borders of Fangorn at dusk &mdash;
only to be surrounded by the Riders
who encircle them upon a knoll at the edge of the grasslands,
where they remain through the long night.

Date: February 28

The three hunters wake before morning.
Legolas fears that the Orc-band has not rested overnight
and is now far ahead across the plains;
Aragorn listens long to the earth
but hears nothing but a rumor of galloping horses, very far away,
and moving toward the north.
They spend a second full day in pursuit,
and cover a second twelve leagues as the Orcs' trail
turns north toward high downs.
The land is quite silent and empty of horsemen and their herds.
As the three again stop overnight they feel heavy weariness
and perceive the dark will of Saruman against them.

Date: February 28

Frodo and Sam spend another day
clambering among the stony slopes of the Emyn Muil,
trying to find a path from its sharp edges
down to the pungent marshes below.

Date: February 29

The early hours find Merry and Pippin amongst the large force of Orcs
that the eored lead by Eomer has surrounded
upon a knoll some three leagues from Fangorn Wood.
Several sorties are attempted before dawn:
some Riders approach the Orcs and kill several before being driven away;
and another Orc-band attacks from the direction of the forest
but are defeated.
Amidst this confusion the Orc leader from Mordor
attempts to spirit the Hobbits away but is killed,
leaving them free upon the plain and unspied in their Elven-cloaks.
<p>
The Riders attack with the dawn,
riding upon the Orcs from the East with the rising sun behind them.
Beneath the blue of the winter morning,
every Orc is hunted and destroyed;
the toughest prove to be Saruman's Uruk-hai,
who almost reach the safety of Fangorn
and whose leader is fought on foot by Eomer himself.
The Riders spend the balance of the day
making a great burning of the Orc-bodies,
and raising a mound over their own dead &mdash;
fifteen of their riders lost to destroy more than two hundred Orcs.

Date: February 29

In the afternoon Merry and Pippin pass beneath the canopy of Fangorn
and meet Treebeard,
the ancient Ent and shepherd of the trees and the forest.
After hearing of their adventures,
and especially of the treachery of Saruman,
he resolves that the White Wizard must be attacked.

Date: February 29

The three hunters set off again in the red dawn
and before noon come upon the remains of an Orc-camp amongst the downs,
which Aragorn guesses was abandoned a full day and a half ago &mdash;
giving the Orcs time to have reached Fangorn wood by yesterday evening.
By nightfall they reach the most northerly
of these downs that run beside the swift Entwash,
and sleep admist cold winds off the Misty Mountains.

Date: February 29

Gandalf in Fangorn wood learns the condition of Merry and Pippin.
He bends his thought southward upon Shadowfax
who speeds north from his pasture in southern Rohan.

Date: February 29

The Lord Faramir, on guard beside the Anduin in Osgiliath,
sees the body of his brother borne past him in the elven-boat
which Aragorn, Legolas, and Gimli cast over the Rauros two days ago.

Date: February 29

After another day of hiking east along the south ridge of the Emyn Muil,
Frodo and Sam reach a ravine that cuts deeply enough into the southern face
that with their elven-rope they reach the plain safely.
There they waylay Gollum whom follows them down the wall,
grasping the sheer rock with his soft feet and hands,
and Frodo tames him by making him swear fealty upon the Ring.

Date: February 30

Treebeard carries Merry and Pippin to Derndingle,
a hollow deep in Fangorn Forest,
where he convenes an Entmoot to argue for immediate action against Saruman.
The hobbits spend the night in a rowan-grove
with a younger Ent named Quickbeam
who had already decided in favor of Treebeard's proposal.

Date: February 30

Aragorn, Legolas, and Gimli wake
upon the northernmost of the line of downs they passed yesterday
as they followed the Orcs who captured Merry and Pippin four days ago.
Sunrise shows that the edge of Fangorn Forest,
which they fear the Orc-band reached two evenings ago,
still lies ten leagues to their north.
They also see horsemen riding from the north,
whom they hail,
and after a tense negotiation
are granted two horses
on which to continue their search for the Hobbits&nbsp;&mdash;
though the leader of the horsemen,
Eomer son of Eomund,
warns that his life may depend on the three travelers
returning the horses safely as they promise.
<p>
Riding north,
the hunters find where a contingent of Orcs from Mordor
joined those fleeing towards the Forest,
but upon reaching and searching the site of yesterday's battle
find no sign of the Hobbits.
They make camp beside the battlefield,
and wake when the figure of a wizard appears for a moment
at the edge of their firelight.
They then discover that their horses have escaped,
leaving them stranded on the edge of the wood.

Date: February 30

Gollum spent last night leading Frodo and Sam along a ravine
away from the frowning cliffs of the Emyn Muil,
from which they descended yesterday evening.
After sleeping through the day in hiding with Gollum,
they march again at nightfall.

Date: March 1

Merry and Pippin spend an entire day with Quickbeam near his rowan-grove
while the Entmoot continues in the distance,
the rumbling voices of the Ents
continuing steadily beneath grey clouds and a cold wind.

Date: March 1

In the light of morning Gimli, Legolas, and Aragorn search the field
across which the Riders charged and destroyed the Orc-band two mornings ago.
Scattered hobbit-prints lead them into the forest and,
on the very ledge where Merry and Pippin met Treebeard two days ago,
they meet Gandalf,
now returned to life as the White wizard and head of the Order.
The wizard explains that Merry and Pippin are safe,
and that the news they brought
is arousing the ancient wrath and power of the Ents against Saruman.
Gandalf calls his horse Shadowfax,
and with him come the two horses that bolted last night;
so all four are able to set out on horseback
for Edoras and the King of the Golden Hall.
After riding for several hours into the night,
they stop for a few brief hours of rest.

Date: March 1

By dawn Gollum has lead Frodo and Sam
to the end of the ravine they have followed overnight.
They find themselves on the northern edge of the Dead Marshes,
where lie the graves of those killed
in the battle between the West and the forces of Sauron
at the beginning of the Age.
Gollum continues to lead them beneath the overcast sky,
and after an afternoon rest they continue marching through the night
amongst the bewildering lights
that flicker above the pools of the marsh.

Date: March 1

The Steward Denethor of Gondor
orders his son Faramir to lead a contingent deep into Ithilien,
where Southron forces are moving north
along the road towards the Black Gate.

Date: March 2

After another day of debate the Entmoot concludes
with the march of the Ents and many Huorn westward
toward the setting sun and the ring of Isengard,
with Merry and Pippin borne in their midst;
at nightfall they crest the final ridge and descend upon the fortress.
After quietly watching Saruman's army pour south from the gates,
nearly ten thousand strong,
the Ents divide into two forces,
some following the armies southwards while the others attack the fortress.
Saruman is almost caught amid the assault but escapes into Orthanc.

Date: March 2

With immortal sight Legolas peers across fields
lit with the slanting shafts of the rising sun,
and describes to Aragorn and Gimli the fortress of Edoras
and the golden roof of Meduseld shining upon its hill-crest.
They and Gandalf negotiate entrance into both fortress and hall,
where the wizard wakes King Theoden from the stupor
woven by his traitorous counsellor Grima &mdash;
who flees when the wizard reveals him as an agent of Saruman.
The Eorlingas is mustered and Theoden himself leads the host westward,
leaving his niece Eowyn to govern the flight of the people into the hills.
King and host make camp for the night after five hours' ride.

Date: March 2

In the early hours Gollum leads Frodo and Sam out of the Dead Marshes
and on to firm land again,
where they cower as a winged Nazgul passes overhead and into the west.
After hiding through the day they continued marching south
into the desolation lying between the marshes and the fences of Mordor.
Frodo begins to flag under the weight of the Ring.

Date: March 3

By dawn the far destruction of the Ring of Isengard is far advanced,
but fires from beneath the plain are endangering the Ents;
so they retreat and spend day and evening preparing to divert the Isen.
In the late evening Merry and Pippin observe more Huorns pouring south
to reinforce those who are already pursuing the armies of Saruman.

Date: March 3

King Theoden and the Eorlingas break camp at dawn
and ride for a second day toward the Fords of Isen,
accompanied by Gandalf, Aragorn, Legolas, and Gimli.
In the morning-light Legolas discerns, far to their north,
the distant shadow of the Huorn-wood which is attacking Isengard.
At sunset they meet a refugee
from yesterday's Second Battle of the Fords of Isen,
who reports Erkenbrand's defeat;
at this news Gandalf sends the King and his companions
flying south to the Hornburg before it is besieged,
while the wizard himself sets out across the fields.
<p>
Gandalf searches the Westfold south of the Fords.
He determines that Saruman has defeated and scattered the western eored
with a force of roughly ten thousand orcs,
and that his forces are now all moving south toward the Hornburg.
Gandalf organizes several responses by directing the fugitives he encounters:
those who still have hope of reaching the Hornburg
he sends there to buttress its defense;
some others under Elfhelm he sends east towards Edoras,
to protect it from any plundering party
Saruman may have spared from his main force;
and the majority, including a force under Grimbold of Westfold,
he sends southwest to join Erkenbrand,
who survived the disaster of the Fords.
In the early night Gandalf interrupts this work to visit Isengard itself,
where he negotiates with Treebeard who deploys a force of Huorns
against the Orc-army.

Date: March 3

Frodo and Sam trudge wearily after their guide, Gollum,
through the blasted waste lying north of the gates of Mordor,
in growing fear,
and with the weight of the Ring dragging ever heavier upon Frodo.

Date: March 4

Hours before dawn,
the Ents complete the dams they have been building,
and send the Isen pouring into the Ring of Isengard
to drown its pits and fires.
Merry and Pippin watch the flood from atop the walls,
and sleep there while the waters recede.

Date: March 4

By dawn the forces of King Theoden have fought and died
through many grueling hours
to defend Helm's Deep
from the army of Orcs that Saruman has deployed against them.
Despite their valor, despite the leadership of Aragorn,
and, yes, despite even the forty-one Orcs killed by Legolas
and the forty-two by Gimli,
all but the last defenses have been lost.
The Dike fell very quickly;
the Deeping Wall repelled an initial assault with ladders,
but then was breached with explosives;
and after standing for several hours against repeated explosions,
the outer wall of the Hornburg is breached just before dawn,
leaving the inner citadel as the last defense.
Eomer, Gimli, and many other defenders
who are not able to reach the Hornburg
retreat to caves further up the Deep.
<p>
The battle dismays King Theoden.
Had he lead his eored into action on the fields,
his men could have enjoyed the strength and mobility of their horses,
instead of fighting dismounted as common foot soldiers;
and the King's own horsemanship
would have allowed him a role in the contest.
After the Deeping Wall is breached,
the King resolves to make the horses of his guard ready
for a final charge out of the citadel
should the wall of the Hornburg also succumb.
Aragorn agrees to join him.
<p>
And so the foremost Orc-companies,
who at the moment of dawn stand atop the causeway
peering through the dust and rubble
that a moment before had been the gates of the Hornburg,
see not a citadel closed and barred and awaiting their assault,
but hear the bright Horn of Helm ringing from the tower
as through open doors the King himself leads the charge against them.
Fighting from horseback,
the King and his guard not only clear the causeway
but drive as far as the Dike,
where they see that a forest of trees&nbsp;&mdash;
the force of Huorn
that Gandalf requested from Treebeard last night&nbsp;&mdash;
now stands across the mouth of the Deep behind the Orc-army,
where before swept only the grasses of the Westfold.
With their horns blowing in echo to the Horn of Helm,
Erkenbrand and a thousand foot soldiers
follow Gandalf over the western ridge of the Coomb
and attack the flank of the enemy.
And, summoned by further blasts upon the Horn of Helm,
the defenders in the citadel and in the caves
pour forth to join in the assult.
Assaulted from two sides,
and particularly terrified at the charge of the Wizard,
most of the Orcs attempt a retreat through the forest of Huorn;
none emerge from the wood's far side.
<p>
After resting through the day,
the King and his guard ride with Gandalf for Isengard,
accompanied by Aragorn, Legolas, and Gimli.
Four hours after sunset,
they reach the Fords of Isen.
It was there, nine days ago, that Theoden's son fell
in the First Battle of the Fords of Isen,
and there Erkenbrand was defeated in the Second Battle
the day before yesterday.
They find the Isen no longer flowing,
its riverbed bare and silent.
They find a burial mound already built,
under which the Riders fallen in the battle
lie safe from scavengers&nbsp;&mdash;
another labor to which Gandalf assigned some men
during his rides last night.
<p>
They continue riding,
and by midnight are five leagues past the Fords.
There they stop to rest for the remainder of the night.

Date: March 4

By dawn and the end of their weary nighttime march,
Gollum has lead Frodo and Sam
to the reeking desolation lying north of Mordor.
They sleep through the day in an oily pit.
In the afternoon,
Sam awakes and overhears Gollum
debating about whether to seize the Ring&nbsp;&mdash;
and hears, but does not understand, Gollum's decision
to lure the Hobbits into the lair of Shelob.
Frodo wakes, refreshed, from a pleasant but forgotten dream,
and the three set out again at dusk.
Late in the evening,
another Ringwraith passes overhead on his winged steed.

Date: March 5

By dawn, the Ents dismantle the last of the dams
with which they had diverted the Isen yesterday to flood Isengard.
As the waters subside,
Merry and Pippin descend from the walls and have breakfast.
Wormtongue arrives on horseback,
and Treebeard&nbsp;&mdash;
faithful to the instructions of Gandalf&nbsp;&mdash;
forces the traitor into the tower of Orthanc.

Date: March 5

The hours before dawn are less restful
for those camped beside the Isen with King Theoden.
The few who sleep are startled awake
when a rustling darkness moves toward them from the south
and surrounds the camp.
The Huorn, the herds of wild trees,
are passing back north toward Fangorn Forest
after avenging themselves upon the Orcs yesterday at Helm's Deep.
Closer to dawn,
water suddenly returns to the dry riverbed of the Isen.
<p>
King Theoden and the others ride at daybreak,
reaching Isengard just after noon.
They find Merry and Pippin waiting at the gate,
whom Aragorn, Legolas, and Gimli have not seen
since the two Hobbits were captured ten days ago.
While Gandalf and the King go to speak with Treebeard,
the Hobbits provide their companions with food, pipeweed,
and an account of how they survived both their capture
and the seige of Isengard.
<p>
In the afternoon,
Gandalf leads them to the foot of Orthanc
to speak with Saruman.
The cunning wizard fails to bring either King Theoden or Gandalf
under the control of his voice.
When he refuses to repent or leave Orthanc,
Gandalf reveals that,
upon his return from death four weeks ago,
he became Gandalf the White&nbsp;&mdash;
leaving Saruman without his own color,
without a place among the order of Wizards.
Gandalf breaks Saruman's staff and dismisses him.
<p>
The party then rides back south
and camps at Dol Baran,
where Pippin looks in the palantir
which Wormtongue hurled at them from the tower
as they finished speaking with Saruman.
Realizing that Saruman has been using the palantir
to inform Sauron of the events of the western war,
Gandalf orders King Theoden to ride immediately south,
while the wizard himself rides for Minas Tirith with Pippin.

Date: March 5

By dawn,
Gollum has finally lead Frodo and Sam within sight
of the entrance to Mordor itself,
the dreadful Gates of Morannon.
Only now does Frodo announce openly to Gollum
that he plans simply to march toward the gate and attempt entrance.
When Gollum pleads that Frodo should instead
let Gollum lead them to a secret entrance,
where capture would be less likely,
Frodo accepts the offer.
At dusk they set out westward along the road to Ithilien,
with the red eye of the Towers of the Teeth
twinkling in the distance behind them.

Date: March 6

The sun is rising upon the golden eaves of Meduseld
as Shadowfax brings Gandalf and Pippin to Edoras,
only a few hours after setting out from Dol Baran,
north of the Fords of Isen.
Pippin and Shadowfax rest
while Gandalf persuades the captains of Rohan to hasten their muster.
After a winged Nazgul passes low over the hall,
the wizard makes a further amendment to their plans,
counseling that Rohan should gather secretly at Dunharrow
instead of openly here at Edoras.
He and Pippin set off upon Shadowfax in the evening,
racing toward Minas Tirith before it falls under siege.

Date: March 6

Back north of the Fords,
Aragorn, Theoden, and their companions
abandon the camp at Dol Baran before dawn.
After crossing the Fords of Isen,
they are overtaken by thirty Dunedain,
who have ridden from the North
in the belief that their captain Aragorn has summoned them.
He confesses that he has not,
but guesses that Galadriel sent a message
after discerning in his mind an unspoken need for his kinsmen.
With the company of Dunedain ride the two sons of Elrond,
who wish to employ their own swords in the defense of the West,
and Aragorn's own horse, Roheryn.
<p>
When they reach the Hornberg,
Aragorn does not rest with the others,
but closets himself alone with the Palantir of Orthanc.
He reveals himself and his ancient sword Anduril as a challenge to Sauron,
then wrests control of the the stone from his Enemy,
claiming it for himself as a prerogative of the ancient Kings.
With the palantir he sees a fleet from Umbar approaching southern Gondor,
where thousands of men remain to meet the invasion
who would otherwise have joined the defense of Minas Tirith.
<p>
After noon, Theoden sets off with his bodyguard and Merry
to travel well-concealed mountain paths toward Dunharrow.
But Aragorn,
having finally resolved to take the Paths of the Dead,
and desperate for speed lest he arrive too late
to defend southern Gondor,
sets out at twilight directly across the plain.
With Aragorn ride the Dunedain, Legolas and Gimli,
and the two Sons of Elrond.

Date: March 6

By morning Gollum has lead Frodo and Sam
out of sight of the gates of Mordor
and along the south road towards Ithilien.
They rest in deep heather during the day,
glad to be among growing plants again.
At night they set out south along the road.

Date: March 7

After riding through the night,
Gandalf and Pippin spend most of the day resting under cover,
having completed one-third of their journey from Edoras to Minas Tirith.
They set off again upon Shadowfax in the evening,
leaving the setting sun behind them as they speed eastward.

Date: March 7

Theoden rides the mountain-roads toward Dunharrow for a second day,
having set out from the Hornburg yesterday at noon.

Date: March 7

The ride of Aragorn and his companions across the plains
brings them to Edoras in the afternoon, and Dunharrow at twilight;
there they eat and rest before taking the Paths of the Dead tomorrow.

Date: March 7

By dawn,
Gollum has lead Sam and Frodo into the rich woodland of Ithilien.
Sam stews a breakfast of rabbits.
The smoke attracts Rangers of Gondor patrolling the area,
who detain the Hobbits
while they execute an ambush against forces from Harad
that are marching along the road to Mordor.
Sam gets his only glimpse of an Oliphant during the successful engagement.
Afterwards,
the Hobbits are interrogated at length by Faramir,
the leader of the Rangers.
They convince him that,
while they did march south with his brother Boromir,
they are not responsible for&nbsp;&mdash;
and, in fact, had not even learned of&nbsp;&mdash;
his death.
<p>
At sunset,
the Rangers return to their secret refuge
behind the waterfall of Henneth Annun.
There Frodo and Sam enjoy hearty dinner and wine
for the first time since leaving Lorien almost three weeks ago.
In private conversation afterwards,
the Hobbits inadvertently reveal that Frodo bears the Ruling Ring
and intends to destroy it.
In response, Faramir promises as much aid to their quest as he can give.

Date: March 8

Messengers reach Minas Tirith from Lebannin,
reporting that a large fleet of corsairs from Umbar
are approaching the mouths of Anduin from the south.
The men of Lebinnin and Belfalas
will have to reserve much strength of arms
to meet this invasion,
leaving Minas Tirith with far less strength than she expected.
The Steward Denethor orders the beacons along the White Mountains lighted.
<p>
At dawn Gandalf and Pippin rest from their overnight ride upon Shadowfax,
the second of the three nights of riding
that the wizards hopes will bring them to Minas Tirith
before war overwhelms its approaches.
After resting through the day they set off upon this last stage,
and as darkness gathers
they see the ancient war-beacons upon the White Mountains come alight &mdash;
the Steward Denethor summoning Rohan to his aid
according to the ancient covenant.

Date: March 8

For a third day Theoden rides secretly through the Mountains,
leading his forces from their victory at Helm's Deep.
By evening they are only one day away
from their mountain stronghold of Dunharrow.

Date: March 8

Aragorn leaves Dunharrow in the morning and,
against the earnest wish of Eowyn, walks the Paths of the Dead.
With him walk Dunedain, the Sons of Elrond, and Legolas,
each leading their horse;
and finally Gimli aghast with with terror.
They emerge from the dark Paths
onto the southern slopes of the White Mountains
about two hours before dark,
and after hard riding reach the Stone of Erech at midnight
where Aragorn calls the ghosts of the Oathbreakers to his allegiance.

Date: March 8

Faramir wakes Frodo in the early hours
and they catch Gollum fishing in the pool below Henneth Annun,
who grudges this treatment despite the fact that Frodo has saved his life.
They depart from the hidden retreat in the morning
and begin marching southward through the woods;
by dark they are seven leagues to the south.
Frodo and Sam camp but Gollum disappears.

Date: March 9

Having long prepared to invade Gondor,
and spurred by the sight of Aragorn
in the palantir of Orthanc three days ago,
the Lord of the Rings ignites Orodruin.
From Minas Tirith they see the smoke and ash that billows from its cone
as a darkness standing up above Mordor,
stained red from underneath by Orodruin's fire.
At sunset,
the wind begins carrying the darkness westward from Mordor,
and by the middle of the night,
Ithilien lies wholly under shadow.

Date: March 9

It has taken only three nights
for Shadowfax to carry Gandalf and Pippin nearly to Minas Tirith.
Before dawn they pass within the Rammas Echor,
the walls which Gondor has built as a defense
around the fields of the Pelennor,
and with the rising of the sun they come at last to Minas Tirith.
The Steward of Gondor, Denethor,
questions Pippin sharply about the death of his son Boromir,
suspicious that a Hobbit should survive
when a strong warrior was killed.
The young Hobbit in repsonse credits Boromir with saving his life,
and in return offers fealty to the Steward.
In the afternoon,
three thousand reinforcements from southern Gondor
enter the city&nbsp;&mdash;
far fewer than the defenders had hoped.

Date: March 9

Theoden comes to Dunharrow in the evening
and finds most of his army already gathered,
thanks to Gandalf's unauthorized instructions
given at Edoras three days ago.
From Eowyn he learns that Aragorn has travelled the Paths of the Dead.
Late in the evening a messenger of Gondor arrives with the Red Arrow,
summoning Rohan to the aid of his realm,
and is dismayed when Theoden cannot promise
that his Riders will reach Minas Tirith at the earliest in one week.
Merry, as royal esquire, rests in a small tent beside that of Theoden.

Date: March 9

At dawn,
Aragorn and his companions set out from the Hill of Erech
with the ghost-army of the Oathbreakers.
The ghosts try to sweep past Aragorn,
but he commands them instead to follow.
By dusk they cross the river Ciril and reach the town of Calembel,
whose people flee before them.
The sun, setting behind them,
stands beneath racks of dark smoke that are passing overhead.

Date: March 9

Gollum rejoins Frodo and Sam as they wake beneath the trees of Ithilien,
and they continue marching south beneath the tense airs above them.
They reach the ravine in which the Morgulduin flows
from the Mountains of Shadow toward the Anduin to the west;
beside it runs the road from Minas Morgul to the ruins of Osgiliath.
They remain on the north side of the valley and,
urged on by Gollum, hike on after nightfall,
then take a few hours of rest in the branches of a tree.

Date: March 9

Faramir leaves the secret refuge at Henneth Annun and reaches Cair Andros.
As darkness covers Ithilien,
he sends his forces south to Osgiliath,
while with three men he himself rides for Minas Tirith.

Date: March 10

<b>The Dawnless Day.</b>
The east wind has continued overnight.
By morning, all of eastern Gondor lies
under the ceiling of dark cloud&nbsp;&mdash;
presumably composed of smoke and volcanic ash&nbsp;&mdash;
which stretches westward from Mordor.
In Minas Tirith,
only a dim grey light indicates that it is daytime.

Date: March 10

Gandalf rouses Pippin in the dark morning and the two go to Denethor,
who has ordered Pippin arrayed as a Guard of the Tower
and employs him as an esquire.
The wizard attends the Steward's councils through the morning,
then leaves the city upon Shadowfax to gather news in the dark outside.
He returns in the evening,
and drives off five Nazgul that harry Faramir and his men
as they retreat from Osgiliath toward the city.

Date: March 10

The ghostly Oathbreakers march through a second swift day
alongside Aragorn and his companions.
By evening they have passed the river Ringlo and entered Lebennin,
largest of the lands of southern Gondor.

Date: March 10

The dawn brings only dim light to Dunharrow
that, like Minas Tirith, now lies beneath the shadows of Sauron.
Theoden decides, under the cover of this darkness,
to abandon secrecy and race across the plains to Minas Tirith,
bringing only supply enough to feed them until their arrival.
By noon he and his army has reached Edoras.
There, Theoden intends to leave Meriadoc behind;
but Eowyn,
who has accompanied the riders in disguise under the name Dernhelm,
takes him on her horse.
The army continues east
and camps at the junction of the Snowbourn and Entwash.

Date: March 10

Gollum wakes just after midnight and leads Sam and Frodo,
who have not slept,
eastward beside the Morgulduin.
When they again rest, beneath brambles, Gollum disappears.
Before dawn, the eastern sky glows red above the Mountains of Ash,
as Orodruin begins to billow forth black vapor;
the darkness upon the land is thick when Gollum returns in the afternoon
and they again march&nbsp;&mdash; south to the great crossroads
where the sun, falling beneath the rack of vapor, gives them a last sunset.
<p>
The east road brings them in sight
of the white bridge before the fortress of Minas Morgul,
but Gollum leads them off the highway to the left
and up the path leading to Cirith Ungol.
There, above the valley,
they watch the Witch-king lead out the armies
that will soon besiege Minas Tirith.
For a moment the Witch-king seems to dimly perceive the Ring,
but his sense is frustrated when Frodo grasps instead the phial of Galadriel.

Date: March 10

An army recently issued from the Black Gate reaches Cair Andros
and begins to cross into Anorien.

Date: March 11

Gondor lies in darkness for a second day
beneath the black clouds flowing west from Mordor.

Date: March 11

Denethor calls his council early in the day,
then sends Faramir to command the defense of the fords at Osgiliath.
At night the news reaches Minas Tirith
that the Witch-king himself
is leading an army through Ithilien toward Osgiliath,
and that Haradrim marching from the south have joined him.

Date: March 11

King Theoden and his army rides east toward Minas Tirith through a second day.
Though they encounter fugitives
who report that Orcs have invaded the Wold,
to their north,
they ignore the threat and continue riding straight for Minas Tirith.
By evening the king has reached the eastern borders of Rohan,
where he and his army camp overnight.

Date: March 11

Aragorn leads the ghost-army of Oathbreakers
across western Lebennin to Linhir,
the great fords across the river Gilrain.
There they come upon men of southern Gondor
already fighting the invaders who sailed from Umbar;
but both friend and foe flee from the dreadful approach of the dead.
The only man brave enough to meet them
is the Lord of Lamedon,
whom Aragorn orders to assemble his forces and follow.
<p>
They halt briefly,
and Aragorn determines that Minas Tirith is in increasing danger&nbsp;&mdash;
probably by using again the palantir of Orthanc that he carries.
He presses his company to ride through the night;
fear of the dead drives the allies of Mordor before them.

Date: March 11

Frodo and Sam spend hours clambering after Gollum
up the stony stairs leading to Cirith Ungol,
a pass between the peaks of the mountains ringing Mordor.
The darkness prevents them from easily determining daytime and nighttime;
they know only periods of great exertion
followed by rest or brief sleep.

Date: March 11

Farther up the Anduin from Gondor,
forces from Dol Guldur cross the river and assault Lorien.

Date: March 12
Character: Pippin

Gondor endures a third day of darkness
as the sky remains overcast by the dense fumes
pouring from Orodruin and blowing west from Mordor.

Date: March 12

The Morgul-army under the command of the Witch-king assaults Osgiliath,
forcing the garrison under Faramir to abandon the ruins
and retreat to the Rammas.
Gandalf rides from the city to their aid.
The army that attacked Cair Andros yesterday
succeeds today in taking the island,
whose garrison retreats toward Minas Tirith.

Date: March 12
Character: Merry

The Riders of Rohan, hastening toward Minas Tirith,
now pass out of their own land and into Gondor.
In the evening they make camp under the peaks of Min-Rimmon,
whose war-beacon was lighted to summon them only four nights ago.

Date: March 12

Aragorn, Legolas, and Gimli sweep across the plains of southern Gondor,
leading the armies of the dead against the allies of Mordor
that have landed and attacked the coast.
Little combat occurs,
as fear of the dead itself sweeps the enemy along before them;
their opponents seek the safety of the ships
in which they had just lately landed.

Date: March 12

Frodo and Sam sleep before Shelob's lair
while Gollum prostrates himself within
and promises to deliver the two Hobbits as victims.
Upon returning and seeing them peacefully asleep,
he actually hesitates for a moment,
but his resolve to betray them returns
when his only welcome is sharp rebuke from Samwise.
He leads them into Shelob's lair and she attacks them.
Though Sam drives off both Gollum and the great spider,
Frodo is left paralyzed by her venom.

Date: March 12

The orc-host which passed into the Wold two days ago,
crossing the Anduin in order to ravage Rohan
while its king and army are away in Gondor,
is destroyed in an unforeseen assault
by the Ents and their herds from Fangorn.

Date: March 13

The darkness of Sauron lies heavy in the upper airs;
four days have now passed since daylight last fell upon Gondor.

Date: March 13

Through the night the army under the chief Nazgul
continues to pour across the Anduin,
and its van reaches the Rammas and breaches it with blasting fire.
In the morning Gandalf returns to Minas Tirith with the wounded
from the garrison that with Faramir is slowly retreating toward the city.
They are overtaken before reaching the gates,
but Denethor sents a mounted sortie to their aid with Gandalf at their head.
Faramir, struck by a Southron arrow and overcome by the Black Breath,
is carried off the field unconscious.
This drives Denethor to again consult his palantir,
with which Sauron shows him the might of Mordor
and drives his mind into black despair.
<p>
Part of the army from the Black Gate that yesterday took Cair Andros
sets out westward into Anorien
to meet the Riders of Rohan and prevent their ever reaching Minas Tirith.

Date: March 13

King Theoden and his host penetrate another day's ride into Gondor
and come beneath the peaks of Eilenach;
five nights have now passed since it and the other beacons were alight.
The Riders make camp in the Druadan Forest that lies about Eilenach.

Date: March 13

The army of Oathbreakers, lead by Aragorn,
reach finally the port of Pelargir upon the Anduin,
where they find the great ships of the invasion from Umbar.
To the final terror of their enemies,
the ghosts reach even those ships already fleeing
by running and riding across the water itself to overwhelm their enemies.
The Dunedain under Aragorn take command of the principal ships
and spend the night bringing aboard
thousands of warriors of southern Gondor who,
with their homes now safe,
prepare to sail north to the rescue of Minas Tirith.

Date: March 13

Sam, believing that Frodo is dead,
takes the burden of the Ring upon himself.
He then puts it on to avoid being captured by the Orcs
that arrive and capture Frodo.
As he follows them beneath their fortress
he learns that Frodo is not dead,
but is unable to enter after them
once they have barred their lower gates.

Date: March 14

Gondor and its lands lie under darkness for a fifth and final day.

Date: March 14

Through the dark day beyond the walls of Minas Tirith,
the armies of Mordor continue to pour across the Anduin through Osgiliath.
They establish their siege and begin bombarding the city,
kindling fire within its first and lowest circle.
Denethor sees the might of Mordor in his palantir and,
despairing of victory, sits heedless by the wounded Faramir.
Command of the city falls to Gandalf,
who walks about with the Prince of Dol Amroth,
rallying men against the despair cast by the lurking Nazgul.

Date: March 14

In the dark morning Aragorn sets forth with his fleet from Pelargir,
bringing thousands of men from southern Gondor
to challenge the seige of Minas Tirith.
They row through the day and into the night,
and see the reek above stained red by the burning city.

Date: March 14

Around mid-day Samwise recovers,
awakening upon the threshold of the under-doors of Cirith Ungol.
He enters the fortress through the gates only to find dead Orcs,
who have been fighting over Frodo's precious mithril-coat;
and one indeed escapes with this and his master's other treasures.
By night Sam finds Frodo in the tower's top chamber,
returns the Ring to him,
and begins searching for clothing in which they can conceal themselves.

Date: March 15

<b>Battle of the Pelennor Fields</b>.
Denethor in madness takes his unconscious son Faramir to Rath Dinen,
intending to burn together upon a pyre there in the tombs;
Pippin flees to seek Gandalf.
The lowest circle of Minas Tirith is aflame when,
at dawn,
the great ram Grond shatters the gates
and the Nazgul Lord passes within.
There he is challenged by Gandalf upon Shadowfax,
but they are interrupted by the horn-calls of the Rohirrim who,
after riding overnight and fighting their way within the Rammas,
charge the fields of Pelennor to the aid of their allies.
<p>
The Nazgul Lord withdraws.
Gandalf follows Pippin to the tombs
and rescues Faramir from the flames which consume Denethor.
But the wizard had hoped in the battle
to balance the power of the Nazgul Lord,
whom prophesies say will not fall at the hands of man.
<p>
Yet when the Nazgul Lord assaults the van of Rohan and kills King Theoden,
he is himself killed by the blades of Meriadoc and the Lady Eowyn.
Prince Imrahil leads out the men of the city in support of the Rohirrim,
but their enemies are reinforced from Osgiliath.
Three hours past dawn &mdash;
the first sunrise since the darkness began five days ago &mdash;
Aragorn decides the battle
by bringing the armies of Lebennin to the field
in the corsairs he captured two days ago.
By nightfall Gondor controls the entire area within the Rammas.
<p>
In the evening Aragorn enters the city secretly to tend the gravely wounded;
but the people remember healing as an ancient manifestation of royalty,
and his work fills the city with rumor.
He wakes Faramir, Eowyn, and Meriadoc from their darkness,
then spends the night tending others wounded alongside the sons of Elrond.

Date: March 15

After clothing themselves in Orc-gear,
Frodo and Sam escape the tower fortress of Cirith Ungol.
They soon abandon the road to avoid Orcs,
and instead travel north through the ravine
between the towering Ephel Duath and the sharp inner ridge of the Morgai.
Frodo casts away his orc-mail as too great a burden.
They see the darkness in tatters above the mountain peaks to the west,
and are heartened both by glimpses of sky and stars
and by finding water and relieving their thirst.

Date: March 15

After failing four days ago,
the forces of Dol Guldur again strike against Lorien
while simultaneously assaulting
the kingdom of Thranduil in northern Mirkwood.
Both elven-realms withstand the attacks.

Date: March 16

Before dawn Nazgul pass over Minas Tirith.
In the morning Aragorn holds council
with Gandalf, King Eomer, and Prince Imrahil;
they decide to march against Mordor to hold the attention of the Eye
while the Ring-bearer,
whom they hope is still free,
seeks the destruction of the ring.
They begin mustering an army of seven thousand,
while three thousand Riders set out north-westward
against the army that entered Anorien to waylay their ride to Minas Tirith.

Date: March 16

Frodo and Sam continue north
through the ravine between the Ephel Duath and the sharp Morgai,
whose precipice they visit.
They see Mount Doom still more than a dozen leagues distant,
and the camps of soldiers southward along the mountain-feet
where Sauron has gathered them
to meet the Lords of the West
whom he expects will assail Mordor through the Morgul Vale.
After moving on again the hobbits pass an orc outpost,
and overhear that Gollum still lives and is sought by the Dark Tower &mdash;
from whom the Enemy would learn of their Quest if he were captured.

Date: March 17

Final preparations are made
for six thousand foot and a thousand mounted soldiers
to march tomorrow toward Mordor from Minas Tirith.
The three thousand riders that set out yesterday under Elfhelm
assault and drive across Cair Andros the orc-army
that four days ago entered Anorien
to check the ride of the Rohirrim to Minas Tirith.

Date: March 17

After marching through the night and into morning,
Frodo and Sam rest,
then set out again in the evening,
moving northward through the valley between the Ephel Duath and the Morgai.
This increases their distance from Mount Doom,
but they must come to the Isenmouthe
before they can descend on to the plain.
<p>
The orc-chieftain Shagrat,
having fled from his command of Cirith Ungol,
arrives at Barad-dur bearing the items recovered from Frodo &mdash;
his elven-cloak, marvelous mail-shirt, and Sam's sword.

Date: March 17

<b>The Battle of Dale.</b>
The Easterlings who several days ago crossed the river Carnen
drive the forces of King Brand back to Dale,
where they are forced to abandon the defense of their town
and retreat into the dwarven-halls beneath Erebor.
Both King Brand and King Dain Ironfoot fall defending the gates.

Date: March 18
Characters: Aragorn Legolas Gimli Gandalf Pippin

The lords of the West march from Minas Tirith eastward towards Mordor
to assault the Dark Lord and keep his attention from the Ring-bearer.
They pass through Osgiliath and camp on the highway leading to Minas Morgul.
Aragorn reaches the crossroads and claims possession of Ithilien;
the statue there of the king is repaired.

Date: March 18
Character: Merry

Merry watches Aragorn and the armies depart from Minas Tirith,
then must return to the Houses of Healing
to recuperate from his wounds &mdash;
received when he stabbed the Lord of Morgul
in the great battle upon the Pelennor three days ago.

Date: March 18

Frodo and Sam rest within sight of the fortress of Durthang,
where the road finally emerges from behind the Morgai
and descends to the plains below.
Sam finds water but glimpses Gollum near his master as he returns.
After eating, drinking, and again filling their water-bottle,
they set out down the road,
only to be overtaken by Orcs
who mistake them for small goblins
and force them to run with them down the long road.

Date: March 19
Characters: Aragorn Legolas Gimli Gandalf Pippin

While the hosts of the West arrayed at the crossroads,
their vanguard with Aragorn comes within sight of Minas Morgul
and casts down the bridge.

Date: March 19

Before dawn the orc-company in which Frodo and Sam have been forced to run
reaches the road-meeting at the Isenmouthe
and Sam in the confusion leads his exhausted master off the road.
After sleeping they move east across the broken plain
then take the high road which they leave only to rest.
They are wary but meet no traffic,
for Sauron has completed the movement of his forces
to meet any attempt at invasion through the Morannon.

Date: March 20
Characters: Aragorn Legolas Gimli Gandalf Pippin

Leaving great force of archers to guard the crossroads,
Aragorn leads his hosts and princes northward through Ithilien.
Imrahil insists that he be heralded as `the King Elessar.'

Date: March 20

During the day Frodo and Sam struggle eastward
along the road towards Barad-dur,
now several leagues from the Isenmouthe which they left yesterday.
They spend the night in hiding off of the road.

Date: March 21
Characters: Aragorn Legolas Gimli Gandalf Pippin

The army lead by Aragorn passes northward through Ithilien,
where in the afternoon Orcs and Easterlings attempt to waylay them;
but the ambush is detected and destroyed.
In the evening Nazgul observe their forces from above.

Date: March 21

For another day Frodo bears the ring eastward
along the road from the Isenmouthe toward Barad-dur,
which draws them also nearer the fire-mountain Orodruin.
Sam finds some muddy water in one of the cisterns along the road
which they drink and fill their water bottle.
At night they creep off the road to sleep.

Date: March 22
Characters: Aragorn Legolas Gimli Gandalf Pippin

The armies of the West remain on the march today &mdash;
their fifth since setting forth from Minas Tirith &mdash;
hoping to challenge the might of Mordor before its very gates,
and thus draw the Eye of the enemy from the Ring and its bearer.
Having defeated a small ambush yesterday,
they meet no further opposition today
as their march carries them nearly to the borders of northern Ithilien;
this is the last evening they will camp among thickets and trees
before passing into the wastes that extend around the Black Gate.
The heralds continue to proclaim Aragorn openly as the King Elessar,
and the Nazgul now shadow the march of the army,
their oppressive presence faintly palpable despite their great altitude.

Date: March 22

Frodo now becomes silent,
speaking not at all as he and Sam struggle east
upon the road toward Barad-dur.
They finally abandon the road
once the smoldering cone of Orodruin stands directly to their south,
and begin moving across the shattered plain towards its feet.
They drink most of the water they collected yesterday and Sam,
who has been drinking less than his share,
becomes very thirsty.

Date: March 22

The lieutenants of Sauron who govern Dol Guldur
make a third and final assault across the Anduin
upon the forest of Lorien.
Like their first efforts,
made eleven and then five days ago,
this assault is pushed back into the Anduin,
accomplishing only fires and damages to the forest
where it borders the River.

Date: March 23
Characters: Aragorn Legolas Gimli Gandalf Pippin

The host of the West are lead by Aragorn out of Ithilien
and into the desolate lands through which the road passes
before coming to the Black Gate.
They can see the southern reaches of the Dead Marshes to their north.
Those soldiers who are unable to bear the horror
of the poisoned land,
and the harassment of the Nazgul,
are sent southwest by Aragorn to retake Cair Andros.

Date: March 23

Frodo and Sam cast away their orc disguises
and all of their gear,
keeping only simple garments, Sam's sword,
and the phial and box which the Lady of the Wood gave them.
They march southward from the road they abandoned yesterday,
covering more than half of the distance remaining to the Mountain of Fire.
They drink their last mouthfulls of water
and sleep, thirsty and exhausted, upon the broken plain of Gorgoroth.

Date: March 24
Characters: Aragorn Legolas Gimli Gandalf Pippin

The army lead from Minas Tirith by Aragorn
moves cautiously towards the Black Gate,
camping north of the road in the blasted lands thereabout.
They find little sleep amidst the long night,
through which wolves and other enemies are heard or glimpsed,
prowling beyond their camp.

Date: March 24

By the last evening of the Ring's existence,
Frodo and Sam have carried it across one last dry and tortured march
to the feet of Mount Doom.
Sam is now so dehydrated that he cannot eat.

Date: March 25

<b>The Downfall of the Lord of the Rings.</b>
The armies of the West have spent the night
camped in the haunted darkness just north of the Black Gate,
while Sam and Frodo rested briefly near the foot of Orodruin.
After sunrise the King brings his army within sight of the Black Gate,
and rides forth in challenge joined by Prince Imrahil, the King Eomer,
and Gandalf,
and with Legolas, Gimli, and Pippin representing their kindreds.
Their surrender is demanded,
and they are shown Frodo's mithril-coat, his elven cloak, and Sam's sword
as evidence that both Hobbits have been captured &mdash;
though in fact all three items were taken from Frodo
eleven days ago in Cirith Ungol.
Gandalf perceives that they hold no prisoner, and scorns their terms.
The parley ends and the hosts of the West are surrounded and attacked
by armies of Orcs and Easterlings.
<p>
By this time Sam,
by alternately carrying and crawling alongside Frodo,
has brought the two Hobbits up the northern slope of Orodruin
to the road that leads to the Sammath Naur on the eastern face.
Gollum assaults them near the door and Frodo,
his pity finally exhausted,
grasps the Ring and curses Gollum.
But at this moment,
Sam chooses pity,
and by not slaying Gollum accomplishes the Quest &mdash;
for moments later,
as Frodo in the Sammath Naur claims the Ring as his own,
Gollum seizes the Ring and then in accordance with Frodo's curse
falls backward into the volcano and the Ring is melted and destroyed.
<p>
Thus the Ring survived more than forty-eight hundred years since its forging,
and more than three thousand years
since Isildur cut it, still warm, from the hand of Sauron
after the victory of the Last Alliance.
<p>
The Dark Tower and its works fall into ruin as the Dark Lord passes away.
While the hosts of the West press upon their enemies before the Morannon,
Gandalf, knowing that the Ring-bearer will be trapped
if he survived his errand,
summons the great eagle Thorondor.
At his direction the eagles Landroval and Meneldor
rescue the Ring-bearer and his servant,
fallen at the feet of Orodruin,
and bear them to the healing hands of their King.

Date: March 27

The Dwarves of Erebor and the Men of Dale,
who ten days ago were forced to take refuge
in the halls of the Dwarves under the mountain
after an army of Easterlings drove them from their town by the lake,
counter-attack and are able to re-capture Dale.
Leading the assault are the new kings Bard&nbsp;II of Dale
and Thorin&nbsp;III &ldquo;Stonehelm&rdquo;,
whose fathers were killed defending the mountain ten days ago.

Date: March 28

Having withstood three assaults upon Lorien
from the fortress of Dol Guldur,
the Lord Celeborn leads his Elves across the Anduin into southern Mirkwood
and beings the destruction of the fortress.

Date: April 6

On this day of the Elven new-year,
the Lord Celeborn,
whose forces have been destroying the fortress of Dol Guldur
in southern Mirkwood,
meets the Elven-King Thrandul who is leading his army south
after successfully defeating the Orcs who assaulted his realm.
Having cleased Mirkwood of its evil,
they will rename it the Wood of Greenleaves.

Date: April 8

First Frodo and then Sam wake on beds in Ithilien,
where they have lain for almost two weeks
after being rescued from the eruption of Orodruin
that followed the destruction of the Ring.
Gandalf leads them to the Field of Cormallen
where Aragorn honors them in front of all the gathered hosts
of Gondor, Rohan, and Arnor.
At dinner they see their old companions Legalas and Gimli,
and discover that both Merry and Pippin
are now soldiers of Gondor and of the Mark.

Date: May 1

Frodo and his companions remain in Minas Tirith
at the insistence of Aragorn,
who awaits the riding of the High Elves
in which Elrond will bring his bride Arwen
now that he has become the King Elessar.

Date: May 1

Elrond leaves Rivendell with his daughter Arwen
for the two-month journey south to Minas Tirith
where he will give her in marriage to the King.

Date: May 8

A week after the coronation of the King,
the new King Eomer leaves Minas Tirith with his sister Eowyn
to return to Edoras and set in order his own kingdom.
He will also prepare a new mound at the foot of the city
to receive the body of King Theoden
when his body returns to Edoras in two months;
in the meantime Theoden lies in state in the White Tower.

Date: May 20

Having left Rivendell at the beginning of May,
Elrond and Arwen reach Lorien after coming safely over the Redhorn Pass
and down the Silverlode.

Date: May 27

After resting a week beneath the trees of Lorien,
Elrond and Arwen leave to continue their journey south
to Minas Tirith where he will give her hand to the King in marriage.
They are joined by Galadriel and Celeborn,
who will also visit Minas Tirith to see this last betrothal
between Elves and Men.

Date: June 14

The two sons of Elrond ride out from Edoras
to meet the procession of High-elves riding from Lorien
and escort their sister into the city.

Date: June 16

Elrond, his sons, and the High-elves with them in Edoras
set out on the final road
by which they will bring Arwen to Minas Tirith
for her to wed the King.

Date: June 25

Gandalf takes Aragorn onto the desolate heights
of the mountain behind Minas Tirith.
At the edge of the snow they find a sapling of the White Tree of Gondor
with which Aragorn replaces the dead remains of the white tree
which have been standing in the court of the Citadel.

Date: Lithe 1

Elrond arrives in Minas Tirith with his daughter Arwen,
whose union with Aragorn he now permits &mdash;
now that the ragged Ranger has become King of all the West.
Many of the High Elves arrive with them,
including Galadriel and Celeborn,
to witness this last union of Elves with Men.

Date: Midyear

King Elessar weds Arwen Undomiel upon Midsummer,
thirty-nine years to the day
after they plighted troth under the trees of Lorien.
Sixty-eight years have passed since they met in the woods of Imladris,
eighty-eight since Aragorn was born to Arathorn and Gilraen,
and 2,778 years since Arwen was born to Celebrian and Elrond Half-elven.

Date: July 18

King Eomer returns to Minas Tirith from Rohan,
where his people are preparing
to receive the body of their late king Theoden
who lies in state in the Citadel of the White Tower.

Date: July 19

The body of King Theoden sets out upon its last journey;
having laid in state in the Citadel of Minas Tirith
for the four months since his fall in the Battle of the Pelennor,
he will now be returned to Edoras
where a mound at the bottom of the hill will be ready to receive him.
The remaining Company of the Ring are among the throng
that rides northwest to escort the body.
Though Aragorn and Arwen will return to Minas Tirith after the funeral,
all the rest of the Company
will be continuing north toward their homes &mdash;
Legolas and Gimli to the north east toward the Forest and Lonely Mountain,
while Frodo, Sam, Merry, and Pippin journey northwest
toward the Shire.
They will be joined along some portion of their way
by Gandalf and many High-elves,
among whom ride Elrond, Galadriel, and Celeborn.

Date: August 7

The funeral escort of King Theoden reaches Edoras
after fifteen days of travel from Minas Tirith.
Arriving with him are Aragorn and Arwen;
Frodo, Sam, Merry, and Pippin;
Legolas and Gimli;
Gandalf;
and the High-elves who were in Minas Tirith
for the Midsummer wedding of Aragorn and Arwen
and who are now returning to their lands in the north &mdash;
Elrond and his sons, and Galadriel and Celeborn.

Date: August 7

The men of the Mark begin three days of preparation
for the great funeral feast and ceremony for their late king.

Date: August 10

The people of the Mark bury King Theoden
in an eighth and final barrow they have
heaped on the east side of the Barrowfield at the foot of the city.
After the funeral the new King Eomer gives his sister, the Lady Eowyn,
as wife to Faramir the Steward of Gondor.

Date: August 14

The four Hobbits and the Elves
who arrived in Edoras a week ago
for the funeral of King Theoden
bid farewell to King Eomer and ride north from the city.
Arwen stays behind at Edoras
while Aragorn her husband leaves to ride with them as far as Isengard;
thus she is parted for the last time from her father Elrond
2,778 years after being born to him and his wife Celebrian.

Date: August 18

Aragorn continues to ride north toward Isengard
with the Hobbits and Elves who are now returning to the North
following their involvement in the War of the Ring or,
in the case of many of the Elves,
their long ride to the south to see his wedding to Arwen.
They come to Helm's Deep,
where Gimli is finally able to show Legolas the beauties
of the Glittering Caves that lie behind the Deeping Coomb,
of which he became enamored
when forced to flee there during the Battle of Helm's Deep
more than five months ago.

Date: August 22

Aragorn and the Hobbits and Elves riding north come finally to Isengard.
From Treebeard they learn that the wizard Saruman
is no longer imprisoned in Orthanc.
The Hobbits make their farewell to Treebeard,
as do Celeborn and Galadriel whom he has not seen since more ancient times.

Date: August 22

Legolas and Gimli bid the other riders farewell,
and accept the invitation of Treebeard
to ride north through Fangorn forest
as they ride toward their homes in the northern Mirkwood
(now named the <i>Wood of Greenleaves</i>
following the victories of the Elves against Dol Guldur,
as they will learn upon their return) &mdash;
Legolas toward the city of the Wood-elves where the father reigns,
and Gimli toward the great caves under the Lonely Mountain
where he will find the old King Dáin Ironfoot has fallen in battle
and his distant cousin Thorin III Stonehelm now reigning.

Date: August 22

At sunset they approach the Gap of Rohan,
the westernmost border of ancient Gondor,
where Aragorn bids them farewell
so that he may ride back to his Queen who waits in Edoras
for both of them to return to Minas Tirith and being in earnest their reign.
Aragorn and his knights do not turn immediately,
but sit awhile upon their horses
to watch the travellers disappear into the sunset,
who in return see behind them
the sunlight gleaming upon the harnesses
and a final flash of green from the Elfstone.

Date: August 28

The Hobbits and Elves who ride north with Gandalf toward their homes
come upon the wizard Saruman, who is also passing north.
After a vicious exchange of words on the part of the ruined wizard,
they continue north while he moves off to the northwest.

Date: September 6

The Hobbits and Elves riding north with Gandalf toward their homes
reach Hollin and the trace ruins of the ancient Elven city of Eregion.
They linger among the stones for a week,
the Elves communing together one last time;
for Celeborn will remain in Middle-earth,
while his wife and Elrond and most of the other High-elves
will soon take ship and pass into the West.

Date: September 13

After a week of rest in Eregion among the ruins of the ancient Elven city,
the time comes for the Elves to part.
Celeborn and Galadriel head east with their companions
over the Redhorn pass
toward their forest of Lorien on the other side of the Misty Mountains,
while Elrond, the Elves of his household, and Gandalf and the Hobbits
continue north along the west side of the mountains
toward Rivendell and the House of Elrond
which lie slightly more than a week's ride to the north.
It took the Hobbits a full two weeks to cross the same distance on foot
when they marched south from Rivendell with the Company of the Ring,
more than nine months ago.

Date: September 21

After eight final days of riding north,
Gandalf and the Hobbits return to Rivendell
accompanied by Elrond, his sons, and many Elves of his household.
It has been more than four and a half months
since Elrond and his advisors rode from Rivendell with Arwen,
bringing her south to her wedding in Minas Tirith;
at least seven months since the sons of Elrond departed Rivendell
to ride south with the Dunedain to fight alongside Aragorn;
and only four days shy of nine months
since the Hobbits and Gandalf left Rivendell
on a cold night of late December
bearing the Ring southward toward its destruction.

Date: September 22

Bilbo Baggins turns one hundred and twenty-nine,
and his birthday is celebrated by Frodo, Sam, Merry, and Pippin
who have all returned just yesterday to Rivendell
after leaving Rivendell with the Ring nine months ago.

Date: September 22

The wizard Saruman reaches the Shire,
having left his ruined fortress of Isengard more than a month ago.
While for many years he deployed only spies into the Shire,
he recently has been employing wealth and, finally, open violence
in order to impose his own rule on the district.
They have cut off access to the Tookland,
since its Thain is opposing them
and his Hobbits are shooting Men on sight;
but the Tookland itself is alone in still remaining out of Saruman's power.

Date: October 5

After a visit of slightly less than two weeks,
Gandalf and the Hobbits leave Rivendell to return to the Shire.
While their journey east along the Road last year was on foot,
they now ride west on stout ponies, and Gandalf upon Shadowfax.

Date: October 6

On their second day of travel from Rivendell,
Gandalf and the Hobbits cross Ford of Bruinen.
Frodo experiences the first
of many periodic bouts with darkness and pain
that he will experience over the coming years,
on anniversaries of the woundings he received on his journey;
it was one year ago today that he was attacked by the Nagzul upon Weathertop
and received the Morgul-knife wound in his shoulder.

Date: October 28

After twenty-five days of travel from Rivendell,
Gandalf and the Hobbits reach Bree at nightfall.
The town has been the periodic victim of violence
since the withdrawal of the Rangers to the war in the south early this year,
and the Barliman the innkeeper is glad to see them.
They share the news of what has happened in the South,
and learn that the pony they bought from Bill Ferny eventually returned
and is safely stabled at the inn.

Date: October 29

The Hobbits and Gandalf spend a second day and night
at the Prancing Pony in Bree.
They arrived late last night from Rivendell
and shared with Barliman news of their travels,
but tonight much of the town turns out to see the travellers
of whose return many expressed so little hope
when they departed in early October of last year.

Date: October 30

Having spent two nights resting at the Prancing Pony in Bree,
the Hobbits are finally ready to return to the Shire,
and ride out with Gandalf in the morning for their last day of travel.

Date: October 30

As the Hobbits approach the Shire,
to their surprise Gandalf turns south off the road
toward the house of Bombadil where he plans to have a long talk.
They will not see him for almost two years,
until they again meet, for the last time, at the Havens.

Date: October 30

As dusk closes around the Brandywine Bridge,
Frodo, Sam, Merry, and Pippin reach the borders of the Shire &mdash;
very much as they left it as they passed under the Hedge
in a misty dawn more than thirteen months ago:
as four Hobbits, travelling together,
without wizard or companion or counsellors.
And yet they now ride stout ponies where, before, they walked;
they wear Elven-cloaks and beneath their cloaks
both Merry and Pippin wear armour;
and all are armed.
<p>
They find the Bridge barred with gates at either end
and guarded by gate-wardens,
that include not only a frightened crowd of Hobbits,
but a Man: Bill Ferny,
who was already been in league with spies from Isengard
when the Hobbits entered Bree on this evening exactly two years ago.
They force Bill Ferny to leave the Shire at swordpoint,
then order that the gates be locked again
before they spend the night with the Hobbit gate-wardens
in the dank gatehouse.

Date: November 1

Frodo and his companions wake in the narrow gatehouse
that guards the Brandywine Bridge,
over which they entered the Shire yesterday evening
after their travels of more than thirteen months.
Having learned that bands of Men are terrorizing the Shire,
they determine to ride straight to Hobbiton
from which the new &lsquo;Chief&rdquo; rules &mdash;
whom they presume is Lotho Baggins.
<p>
Upon reaching Frogmorton in the evening,
they are arrested by the First Eastfarthing Troop,
a large crowd of Shirriffs that is not permanently stationed in the town.
Finding the local inn closed,
they resign to spending a second night in a guardhouse.

Date: November 2

On their second morning in the Shire
since their return two evenings ago,
Frodo, Sam, Merry, and Pippin again wake in a guardhouse &mdash;
this time in Frogmorton at the post of the First Eastfarthing Troop,
a crowd of Sherriffs who arrested them
upon their arrival yesterday evening.
After annoying the Sherriffs by delaying their start in the morning,
then forcing them to walk in front of their ponies,
the four finally leave them behind at the Three-Farthing Stone
and continue toward Hobbiton on their ponies.
<p>
They come to Bywater at dusk and find many houses ruined or burned
or replaced with other structures.
A dozen Men with clubs attempt to bar their way,
but are dissuaded and scattered by their threat of the Hobbits' swords.
As they plan their response,
Frodo insists &mdash; and will be obeyed &mdash;
that they slay no Hobbits in the coming engagements;
and though Pippin and Sam mention that they might seek safety,
Merry is determined to force a confrontation,
and blows the Horn-cry of Buckland on the great horn
that Eomer and Eowyn gave him
upon his departure from Rohan two and a half months ago.
<p>
More than a hundred Hobbits assemble at their call,
and Pippin rides for the Tookland to summon more from his clan,
who have been violently resisting the incursion of Men upon their lands.
In the late evening a gang of twenty men approach the bonfine
the Hobbits have lit in the main street of Bywater,
and Merry confronts them at the head of more than two hundred armed Hobbits;
their leader is brought down by Hobbit archery
and the rest surrender.
As night settles in,
Merry sets guards around the perimeter of Bywater,
Sam retrieves his father from near Hobbiton,
and Frodo and Sam spend the night with the Cottons.

Date: November 3

<b>Battle of Bywater.</b>
Frodo and Sam wake at Farmer Cotton's in Bywater
to the news that the Tooks have killed or routed from their lands
all of the Men that had been guarding it,
that the Thain has moved south with some of his kin
against the men in the Southfarthing,
and that Pippin will soon return with the balance of the clan's forces.
<p>
Around ten in the morning Merry brings news from his scouts
that nearly a hundred men are moving east toward Bywater,
burning as they come.
When Pippin arrives with a hundred Tooks,
Merry deems his forces sufficient to ambush the Men;
thanks to his leadership,
in the ensuing Battle of Bywater more than seventy men are killed
against a balance of nineteen Hobbit fatalities.
<p>
Frodo, Sam, Merry, and Pippin then proceed with two dozen Hobbits
to Bag End where they find Saruman the wizard has ensconced himself
as ruler of the Shire.
After the wizard attempts and fails to stab Frodo,
he is slain by his servant;
and with the death of Saruman
historians reckon the final end of the War of the Ring.
